Thus, our conclusions harmonize with those of Brugsch and Schittenhelm in so far as they are concerned with the nuclein metabolism. They add, however, the observation that the elimination of nitrogenous substances of protein origin has a protracted character, and that the oxidation of as simple a substance as asparagin proceeds at a subnormal rate. The most striking peculiarity observed in our patient was the very imperfect elimination of ingested urea when the patient was placed on a diet containing only six grams of nitrogen per day, and a much more complete elimination when the diet contained thirteen grams of nitrogen.
In this series of twenty-four persons inoculated with antityphoid vaccine, the immune bodies in the blood reached their height within two months after the first inoculation, or one month after the third, then fell rapidly within the next two months. Only nineteen of the cases could be followed longer, and eight of these were negative for bactericidins within ten months after inoculation, and fifteen were negative after thirteen months. Only one serum reacted in a dilution of 1 to 1,200 at the end of thirteen months. The addition of lecithin to the vaccine did not influence the local reaction after inoculation, nor did it appreciably affect the formation of immune bodies to the typhoid bacillus.
In rabbits and cats in which a hemorrhagic anemia has been produced, the hemoglobin is regenerated much more slowly than the red corpuscles, but the index, relative to the red corpuscles, never rises above one. The resistance of the corpuscles is not increased. In erythrocytes developing in the bone marrow, the nucleus of the erythroblasts seems to lose its chromatin, but is apparently not extruded. Punctate basophilia of the erythrocytes is a common feature and seems to result from a diffusion of nuclear chromatin through the cell. Extramedullary myeloid metaplasia is generally slight, but in moderately severe and long continued anemia from bleeding it may be very extensive. Lipemia usually occurs when the blood is reduced below a certain limit. The greater part of the fat in the serum can be extracted with ether and is stained by osmic acid. Extensive fatty infiltration of the organs may occur and also widespread necrosis in the central parts of the liver lobules. Pigmentation of the internal organs is usually only slight, but may be considerable, particularly in the spleen. Although there are minor differences, all the essential features of anemia produced by toxins can be reproduced by hemorrhage.
Extracts of the kidneys of normal rabbits prepared one, two, three, and four days after the intravenous injection of egg-albumin and horse serum have the power to sensitize guinea pigs to a second injection of these proteins. The sensitization by first and second day extracts was constant and intense, that by the third day extracts was less marked and sometimes was not evident, and that by the fourth day extracts was only occasional, and when present was always weak. Comparative studies of the power of the blood, liver, and kidney to sensitize, indicate that this sensitization depends on the content of foreign protein in the circulating blood and not upon its accumulation or fixation in the tissues of an organ. This opinion is supported by other experiments in which the sensitizing power of the blood and of the extracts of unwashed kidneys was compared with the sensitizing power of extracts of washed kidney. The weak sensitizing power of washed kidney extract is taken as evidence that foreign proteins of the kinds used are not held in the tissues of the kidney, and if these results may be applied to nephrotoxic proteins, it follows that nephritis is not due to selective and persisting fixation of a protein by the renal cells, but is due to the action of such protein merely during the process of its elimination. In experimental acute nephritis of the type due to uranium nitrate, the power of sensitization to egg-albumin is prolonged for twenty-four hours, and in the chrornate type for forty-eight hours, thus indicating that in nephritis, of the acute type at least, the elimination of a foreign protein is delayed. Attempts to study by the same methods the elimination of vegetable and bacterial proteins have failed.
This investigation brings out three points. 1. During the first three or four weeks after splenectomy hemoglobinuria due to hemolytic serum was not followed by jaundice. 2. One month and more after splenectomy the red cells had an increased resistance to hemolysis. 3. Three and a half months after splenectomy and even later, jaundice occasionally occurred spontaneously. Attempts to explain these three phenomena have been based on the following possibilities: (1) that some function of the spleen is essential for the degradation of hemoglobin or for the elaboration of its derivatives; (2) that there is some interrelation between the spleen and the blood-forming organs or between the spleen and the blood-disintegrating mechanism, or perhaps both interrelations exist; (3) that there is a disturbance of the hemolyzing or bile-forming function of the liver dependent on the blood changes following splenectomy. This multiplicity of problems and likewise of possible explanations has rendered the presentation of the explanatory work in one communication extremely difficult. In the interests of clearness, therefore, the various phases are dealt with in separate papers.
The results of this study may be stated as follows. 1. Rapid injection of more than 0.06 of a gram per kilo of hemoglobin intravenously into a normal animal is followed by the appearance of hemoglobin in the urine (pelvis of kidney) within eight to ten minutes. 2. After rapid injection of more than 0.012 of a gram per kilo per minute of hemoglobin, 16 to 36 per cent. of the total amount, if this equals 0.25 of a gram per kilo, is eliminated in the urine and is accompanied by choluria. 3. If the injection of not more than 0.35 of a gram per kilo is made slowly (less than 0.01 of a gram per kilo per minute), the amount eliminated in the urine is only 2.33 to 9.5 per cent. of the total amount injected, and choluria does not occur. 4. The concentration of free hemoglobin in the blood which constitutes the threshold value of the kidneys for hemoglobin is approximately 0.06 of a gram of hemoglobin per kilo of body weight. When about this concentration is reached, hemoglobin appears in the urine. 5. The amount of hemoglobin per kilo of body weight which, after rapid injection, may be retained without jaundice, is approximately 0.18 of a gram. When 0.22 or 0.23 of a gram is retained bile pigments appear in the urine. The threshold of the liver for jaundice in point of hemoglobin saturation lies, therefore, between 0.18 and 0.22 of a gram per kilo of body weight. With slow injections a greater amount may be retained without choluria. 6. The absence of the spleen does not alter greatly the percentage of hemoglobin eliminated by the kidney, nor does it raise the threshold of the liver for jaundice. 7. In the presence of jaundice, either hemolytic or obstructive, the amount of hemoglobin retained by splenectomized animals is slightly diminished and that eliminated by the kidneys is correspondingly increased. Upon these data may be based the following explanation of the mechanism by which free hemoglobin is removed from the blood serum. Hemoglobin is not removed by the kidney until its concentration in the blood serum reaches a certain level (0.06 of a gram of free hemoglobin per kilo of body weight). This constitutes the threshold value of the kidneys for hemoglobin and when it is reached hemoglobin appears in the urine. When the concentration is lower, hemoglobinuria ceases; at the same time, however, the liver, and possibly other tissues, take up hemoglobin as soon as mere traces are present in the serum and they continue this removal whether the renal threshold is exceeded or not. The two processes go on simultaneously, the rate of removal, when the renal threshold is exceeded, being for the kidneys 17 to 36 per cent., and for the liver and other tissues 64 to 83 per cent, of the total amount introduced. The hemoglobin which is removed by the liver is transformed into bile pigments. If the amount reaching the liver is small and is received slowly, the amount of bile formed is not increased above the excretory capacity of the liver, and it is removed by the bile passages without the occurrence of choluria. This is shown in our experiments in which injections of hemoglobin were made more slowly than 0.01 of a gram per kilo per minute. On the other hand, if the hemoglobin is taken up by the liver rapidly and in large amounts, the bile capillaries are overtaxed and the bile cannot be rapidly removed, but is reabsorbed into the blood, and choluria develops. If this theory is correct we have an explanation of those instances of blood destruction in man characterized by jaundice, but not accompanied by hemoglobinuria. In a slow, gradual destruction of the red blood cells, the liver removes the hemoglobin from the serum so rapidly that the concentration of hemoglobin in the serum does not reach the threshold value of the kidneys and hemoglobinuria, therefore, cannot occur. The constant absorption of large amounts of hemoglobin by the liver and the increase in bile formation which results does, however, overtax the bile passages and jaundice occurs. In the same way may be explained the continuance of jaundice after the disappearance of a transient hemoglobinuria. A rapid destruction of a large amount of blood raises the concentration of hemoglobin in the serum so quickly that the threshold value of the kidney is quickly exceeded and hemoglobin appears in large amounts in the urine. When an amount of hemoglobin sufficient to reduce the concentration of the serum below the threshold value of the kidney has been removed, a considerable amount of hemoglobin may still remain in the serum, and it is the slow elimination of this through the liver that causes the choluria to continue. The demonstration that the absence of the spleen has no important influence on the elimination of hemoglobin by the kidney, on its transformation into bile pigments, or on the removal of such pigments, is of interest in connection with an observation made in the first paper of this series. This was concerning the frequent failure of jaundice to follow the administration of hemolytic serum during the early period following splenectomy. Among the possible explanations was the suggestion that the spleen is in some way concerned in the disintegration of free hemoglobin or in the elaboration of its derivatives. The present investigations demonstrate that such an explanation is without experimental basis, though it does not controvert the possibility of the spleen being concerned in liberating hemoglobin from the red cells and suggests that the failure of jaundice is due to some other factor or factors. Evidence to indicate that the changes in the blood that follow splenectomy are important factors is offered in the third paper of this series.
When the auricles fibrillate, the following effects are observed. 1. The arterial blood pressure may rise, fall, or remain stationary. Usually it falls. If it falls, it generally rises again towards or to the initial pressure. 2. The venous pressure changes are the reverse of the arterial. 3. The intestinal volume and the cardiac output changes are in the same direction as those of arterial blood pressure. 4. From these observations it may be concluded that the peripheral circulatory effects are purely passive. 5. The volume of the heart decreases except in instances where there is reason to believe that the circulation is failing. All the changes described in the foregoing paragraphs, and also the variations in blood pressure reactions which occur from time to time, are attributable to alterations in the rate of ventricular contraction. Similar, though perhaps less profound changes, are seen when the heart rate accelerates in like degree in response to regular induction shocks.
1. There is a great difference between embryonic and adult tissue as far as their growth outside of the organism is concerned. Adult tissue grows only in plasma. Embryonic tissue grows also very well in serum and serum plus agar. In Ringer's solution and in Ringer's solution plus agar no growth occurs, whether embryonic or adult tissue is employed; survival and emigration of cells are seen to some extent. 2. For the growth of connective tissue cells of chick embryo, unheated homogenic serum is a better culture medium than heated serum. The growth of epithelial cells is not thus influenced. 3. Heated heterogenic serum is a better culture medium for growth of embryonic connective tissue cells than unheated. 4. There is an inverse ratio between the hemolytic power of heterogenic sera and the extent of growth of tissue in them. This inverse ratio is not found in heterogenic plasmas.
The all important point revealed by the investigation is the fact that a large proportion of bone and joint tuberculosis occurring in children in Edinburgh owes its origin to infection by the bovine bacillus. The bovine bacillus is introduced into the system practically by one route only, that of ingestion, and the medium with which it is ingested is cow's milk. It is not my intention to criticize in any way the existing conditions of milk supply. I have furnished proof of what is actually occurring and no one will deny that the evil is a remediable one. In those cases in which the human bacillus was present, a considerable proportion showed a definite history of pulmonary tuberculosis affecting a co-resident, and every fact went to prove that the infection had been a direct one from patient to child. A complete distinction can be drawn between human and bovine bacilli, and the distinction is best secured by subjecting the organism to a series of tests such as I have detailed. The subject is one which ought to be investigated in a series of different localities. It is possible that the locus may be a factor in the explanation of the difference between the above results and those of other observers.
Mice dying several days after injections of pneumococci, both living and dead, frequently show at autopsy large intrathoracic hemorrhages. The histological study of the thoracic organs indicates that there occurs in each case a sharply circumscribed, acute degeneration of the wall of some large vessel, usually the ascending aorta or one of the pulmonary arteries. This degenerated portion is torn out by the pressure of the blood with almost complete disappearance of the vessel wall, leading to a gross hemorrhage. A similar change is occasionally found in the walls of the veins which contain cardiac instead of smooth muscle. We have found this lesion only in mice which had been recently inoculated with pneumococci. Negative cultures at autopsy, the lack of inflammatory reaction, and the occurrence of the conditions after injection of dead pneumococci suggest the cause to be a toxic degeneration of the vessel wall brought about by the poisons of the injected organisms.
The four series of experiments described above indicate clearly that tetanic stimulation of the sinus region of the auricles is of material assistance to massage in the resuscitation of the heart. It causes the auricles to generate impulses, either rhythmical or irregular, to which the ventricles, when susceptible, respond. When massage administered for brief periods has failed to resuscitate the heart, the same period of massage combined with tetanic stimulation of the sinus has usually brought the circulation back to normal. In some instances massage alone when continued over long periods has been without effect, and to all appearances would have continued to be without effect, whereas at such a time massage combined with stimulation of the sinus has effected recovery. Whether the stimulus causes the auricles to beat normally or to fibrillate seems to make no essential difference in the end result. Not infrequently conductivity and irritability are lowered to such an extent by the cessation of the circulation, that impulses generated in an auricle started by stimulation can at first manifest no effect upon the ventricles. Under such circumstances massage alone or, more frequently, massage plus stimulation may cause the ventricles to beat with their inherent slow rate. Often then the force of the ventricular contractions is insufficient for the maintenance of an effective circulation. In such cases, however, with the gradual improvement in the condition of the heart, the auricular impulses, as a rule, soon begin to reach the ventricles, with the result that the latter immediately begin to beat more rapidly and effectively. The beneficial results of stimulation of the auricles, therefore, manifest themselves relatively late, but none the less effectively. It has been found that even after the heart has begun to beat, stimulation of the sinus region may still be of some assistance, though in another direction. It not infrequently happens that after resuscitation of the heart the blood pressure fails to rise above a certain low and insufficient level. In such cases repeated tetanic stimulation of the sinus may accelerate the rise of blood pressure and so hasten recovery (protocol of experiment 12, series II, and text-figure 5). No attempt has been made to determine the mechanism of this effect.
We draw the following conclusions from our experiments on the antigenic properties of chemically pure casein and some of its split products. Casein and paranuclein have distinct antigenic properties, particularly as shown by their ability to sensitize guinea pigs for subsequent anaphylactic intoxication by each other or by milk. This sensitizing ability and a corresponding ability to intoxicate are indistinguishably equivalent, under the conditions employed. On immunizing rabbits by repeated injections of paranuclein or of casein, and subsequently testing their sera for precipitins and fixation antibodies, it was found that casein apparently produces them much more readily, giving an antiserum that reacted (fixation) in very high dilution with casein (0.000,000,1 of a 1 per cent. solution), but much less strongly with paranuclein. Only one of two antiparanuclein sera showed the presence of antibodies to paranuclein by the delicate fixation reaction, and that in relatively small amounts. The two antibodies to casein and to paranuclein are, in the case of casein quantitatively, and in the case of paranuclein absolutely specific. A solution of the products of complete peptic digestion of casein fails to sensitize to paranuclein and gives no fixation reaction with an anticasein or antiparanuclein serum. It intoxicates animals sensitized to paranuclein but no more markedly than it does normal animals. It also fails to show specific intoxication in an animal that has been sensitized by the same substance. The amino acids, glutamic acid, and leucin, the principal components of their kind in casein, and in the same proportion therein present, likewise failed to show antigenic properties. They do not sensitize animals to milk intoxication or to intoxication by themselves, and likewise failed to produce precipitins in rabbits in a preliminary experiment. These experiments are regarded as a fairly systematic analysis of the antigenic properties of split products of a single protein. They are analogous to, though less complete than the work of Wells (6) on egg-white. They seem to present the additional advantage of dealing with what is probably the only protein certainly known chemically, and in its purest form. They serve, moreover, as an introduction to the following study of the antigenic properties of a combined protein.
1. Erythrocytes have definite lipoidal constituents and lipoidal combinations peculiar to the species. 2. Certain lipoids and lipoidal combinations act as specific antigens. 3. The increase in serum lipase which occurs upon immunization of animals to foreign red cells is, at least in part, specific. 4. This specific lipase plays, no doubt, an important part in specific serum hemolyses.
We are unwilling to draw any very definite conclusions from the experiments, partly because they show a survival of implanted skin of so much shorter duration than that which seems to occur in the case of spontaneous implantation cysts, and partly because the method of reëxposing the submerged grafts is rather a crude way of testing their vitality. Nevertheless, the following points seem clear: 1. The repeated transplantation of a piece of skin from one animal to another confers no exceptional power of growth upon that skin. 2. The repeated implantation of skin into one animal decreases, if anything, its receptivity for such grafts. 3. The burial of skin in the interior of the body causes, after a time, a change in the skin of such a nature that it cannot resume its normal function as an external covering tissue, even when its circulation \ is well maintained and it is buried in the body of the same animal. The experiments do not determine how long the cells of the skin actually remain alive, and indeed it is conceivable that the mere maceration of the protective horny layer puts the skin, when reëxposed, into the position of a moist tissue, such as the intestinal mucosa, so that it readily dries up and succumbs. Nor do the experiments throw any light upon the possible existence of cytolytic substances in the circulating fluids, although, naturally, the idea of such an action has always been present in our minds in observing the gradual loss of vitality in the transplanted tissues.
The liver of the embryo chick during the first two weeks of development contains an abundance of isotropic fatty globules which represent a mixture of lipoids in which phosphorized fats predominate. During the third week of incubation the fatty globules in the liver change their physical and chemical characters. They become anisotropic and exhibit the reactions and properties of esters of cholesterol. The phosphorized fats gradually disappear from the liver during the third week. The phosphoric acid utilized by the embryo chick in calcification is derived from phosphorized fats. It is suggested that the phosphorized fats are split in the liver, the glycerophosphoric acid portion being liberated for calcification, while the free fatty acids are esterfied by cholesterol. A review of chemical analyses of aortic atherosclerosis and calcification made by others, and a comparison of the conditions in atherosclerosis with those of the developing chick liver, suggest that pathological calcification results from a splitting in situ of phosphorized fats with subsequent formation of calcium salts, as suggested by Baldauf.
1. Excised rings of the coronary artery of the ox properly weighted react to epinephrin by dilatation. 2. This reaction of the ox coronary is not an active dilatation, but is in the nature of a sudden lowering from a high to a relatively low degree of tonus. The tonus is not, however, entirely abolished by epinephrin. 3. The degree of relaxation produced by epinephrin is not constant. It depends on several factors other than the concentration of epinephrin used. 4. It is possible to increase the sensitiveness of the coronary artery to epinephrin. 5. There is no evidence of any primary constrictor effect on the ox coronary from epinephrin in most dilute solutions, nor can the existence in this artery of any constrictor mechanism of sympathetic origin be determined by the excised ring method.
1. The modified Meyer method here proposed, of parallel tests upon segments of surviving carotid and coronary arteries from the ox, is a satisfactory means for detecting epinephrin in complex body fluids like blood. 2. At the present time there is no evidence that epinephrin, in amounts sufficient to produce its physiological effects upon any hitherto used test objects, exists in the circulating blood, with the exception of blood from the suprarenal vein. 3. The examination of uncoagulated blood from six persons with high blood pressure has failed to show the presence of epinephrin or other constricting substances. 4. The constrictor substance in defibrinated blood and serum is not an epinephrin-like substance. In its point of action and its effects it is similar to barium chlorid. It is a direct stimulant to smooth muscle and seems to have no relation to the sympathetic innervation of muscle.
The asexual cycle of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum has been cultivated in vitro in human blood. The parasites have been grown also in red blood cells in the presence of Locke's solution, free of calcium chlorid and in the presence of ascitic fluid. The parasites grow within red blood cells and there is no evidence that they can be grown outside of these cells. The parasites are destroyed in a very few minutes in vitro by normal human serum or by all modifications of serum that we have tested. This fact, together with numerous observations of parasites in all stages of growth apparently within red cells, renders untenable the idea of extracorpuscular development. Leucocytes phagocytize and destroy malarial plasmodia growing in vitro only when the parasites escape from their red blood cell capsule or when the latter is perforated or becomes permeable. Successive generations of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum have been cultivated in vitro by removing the leucocytes from the culture and by transplanting to fresh red blood cells and serum at proper intervals. The asexual cycle of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum cultivated in vitro does not differ from the same cycle growing in vivo. The sexual cycle has not been cultivated, though we have obtained some evidence of the possibility of its accomplishment. There can no longer be any doubt that Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum are separate and distinct species. When grown in an identical culture medium and under exactly the same conditions they remain distinct. In twenty-nine cultures of aestivo-autumnal parasites many forms and sizes have been observed, so that evidence is supplied of the occurrence of different varieties of aetivo-autumnal malarial plasmodia. The so called tertian aetivo-autumnal variety may be seen at the proper stage in all cultures grown from merozoites. The form and appearance of the same culture of plasmodia may vary greatly under different conditions which are not necessarily destructive to the parasites. Their generation period may vary from thirty hours (aetivo-autumnal) to four days (tertian), as a result of variation in the temperature at which they were cultivated. Sexual parasites grow in the cultures and are more resistant to unfavorable conditions than schizonts, often living several days after the latter die out. Forms suggesting parthenogenesis have been observed.
Virulent pneumococci injected into the cranial or spinal cavities of monkeys produce constantly a meningitis closely resembling pneumococcus meningitis in man, except that the experimental disease pursues a more rapid course to the invariable death of the untreated animal. An homologous immune pneumococcus serum injected into the spinal canal exerts a restraining influence upon the disease to the extent that when employed early it prevented, exceptionally, the occurrence of infection and thus saved the life of the animal, and when given later it at first retarded the disease but subsequently exerted no beneficial action and was powerless to save life. A mixture of sodium oleate, immune serum, and boric acid exerted regularly a more powerful action than immune serum alone, and not only prevented the occurrence of infection but also, when administered repeatedly, arrested the progress of an actually established infection and led, often, to the enduring and perfect recovery of the inoculated animal. It is proposed to employ a similar mixture in the direct treatment of pneumococcic meningitis and possibly of still other accessible local pneumococcic infections in man.
Without claiming any close analogy between the autolytic changes and pigmentation in pathological processes, it has, we believe, been shown that iron-containing, as well as other kinds of pigments, may be formed during the autolytic degeneration of parenchymatous cells independently of the hemoglobin in the blood stream, and hence may be derived from the proteid constituents of the cell itself.
Aside from the nerve fibers which enter the pace-making node from the subepicardium, there were observed within the limits of the node a few ganglionic cells and a plexus of moniliform nerve fibrils in very close relation to its muscle fibers, hence the sino-auricular node, like the auriculo-ventricular, may be considered from a histological standpoint a neuromuscular organ.
1. Spirochoeta gallinarum can be cultivated in suitable artificial media for many successive generations and probably for indefinite periods. The presence of fresh tissue and a certain amount of oxygen seems to be essential for its growth. No perceptible odor is produced in the cultures. 2. The maximum growth of Spirochoeta gallinarum is reached on about the fifth day, but the phase of degeneration commences slowly and gradually, so that in this respect the gallinarum differs from the duttoni, kochi, obermeieri, or novyi, whose cultures are characterized by sudden onset of degeneration soon after the maximum growth is attained. 3. No rod formation resembling bacilli arises in the course of multiplication of Spirochoeta gallinarum in cultures. Many round or oval bodies appear in old cultures, but no infection of animals or formation of spiral forms from these granules has been produced. The granules are probably the degeneration products derived from the periblast of the spirochoetoe. 4. Cultures of Spirochoeta gallinarum, either old or young, do not contain a form which passes through a Berkefeld filter (V) that infects chickens or grows into spirochaetae. 5. Spirochoeta gallinarum remains virulent for chickens after being in cultures for at least thirteen generations, but it may become avirulent under certain cultural conditions. The inoculation of chickens with the attenuated culture renders the birds refractory to the subsequent infection with a virulent strain. 6. When the spirochaetae are cultivated in the media containing rabbit kidney instead of chicken muscle, the individual specimens are somewhat thicker, but otherwise typical. 7. Spirochoeta gallinarum multiplies in culture by transverse division. No positive evidence of a longitudinal division has been obtained.
The foregoing experiments demonstrate that the immunity induced in mice by preliminary treatment with tumor or certain of the normal tissues reaches its maximum at about the tenth day, after which it gradually diminishes, probably to disappear after the lapse of about eighty days. It is significant that the curves with the three tissues, spontaneous tumor, kidney, and embryo skin, should parallel each other so closely, and the occurrence renders extremely probable the view, previously expressed by Russell and by Woglom after an examination of very young grafts in immune mice and rats respectively, that the resistance elicited in each case is similar. It is evident, however, that there is a difference in the degree to which it is developed.
1. The filtered blood serum of rabbits infected with pneumococci is not toxic. 2. Extracts of pneumococci prepared by keeping emulsions of the bacteria in salt solution at 37 degrees C. for varying periods of time may be toxic, and when injected intravenously into guinea pigs, may produce a train of symptoms followed by acute death resembling that seen in acute anaphylaxis. Such extracts, however, are not uniformly toxic and it has been impossible to discover the exact conditions under which such extracts become toxic. 3. When the centrifugalized peritoneal washings of guinea pigs infected with pneumococci are injected into the circulation of normal guinea pigs, these animals very frequently exhibit symptoms like those seen in acute anaphylaxis, and a considerable proportion of the animals die acutely. 4. When pneumococci are dissolved in dilute solutions of bile salts and the solution resulting is injected intravenously into rabbits and guinea pigs, these animals show with great constancy the same symptoms that are seen in acute anaphylaxis. The solution of pneumococci in bile may occur in ten minutes at 37 degrees C. or in half an hour on ice. This is considered evidence that the toxicity of the solution does not result from digestion of the bacterial protein, but is due to substances preformed in the bacterial cells and set free on their solution. The toxicity of the solution is diminished or destroyed by heating to 55 degrees C. or over.
These experiments demonstrate that protective substances are usually present in the blood of patients recovering from lobar pneumonia. As a rule, the appearance of protective bodies in the blood, when demonstrable, coincides rather sharply with the period of critical fall in temperature and the disappearance of symptoms. These substances are not present in the blood in any measurable degree before the crisis, but afterward they may reach a considerable concentration. In certain instances, protective substances either become evident some time after the occurrence of the crisis, or cannot be demonstrated at any period of the disease. Experiments in which it is possible to test serum against an homologous strain of pneumococcus yield in the majority of cases evidence of the presence of protective bodies; whereas in those in which stock cultures are used, the serum, as a rule, shows no protection. The development of specific protective substances in the serum of patients with lobar pneumonia suggests that these bodies may play a part in the mechanism of recovery.
Studies of the bacteriology of the blood were made in thirty-seven cases of lobar pneumonia. The pneumococcus was isolated from the blood in approximately 50 per cent. of the cases studied. The course of infection in individuals with pneumococcus in the blood was more severe than in those in which no organism could be cultivated from the blood. 77 per cent. of the patients with positive blood cultures died, and 79 per cent. of patients with negative blood cultures recovered. In fatal instances of pneumonia, where the pneumococcus was found in the blood, the number of organisms per cubic centimeter of blood was very high in the last stage of the disease. In individuals dying of pneumonia without blood infection, the disease was characterized by a rapid spread of the local process in the lungs. It is not unlikely that the symptoms of collapse, developing on the fifth or sixth day of lobar pneumonia, are often the expression of serious invasion of the blood by the pneumococcus. In other instances, they mark an extension of the local process in the lungs. Strains of pneumococcus isolated from the blood of patients with lobar pneumonia were usually of high animal virulence. In a few instances where the organism isolated from the blood was of low virulence for animals, the patients recovered. The protective power of a univalent antipneumococcus serum was tested against nineteen strains of typical pneumococcus and against four strains of closely allied organisms. The serum manifested some degree of protection against twelve out of nineteen strains of typical pneumococci. No protection was observed against the atypical organisms. In eight instances the degree of protection obtained was high, in three low, and in one there occurred only a prolongation of the period of life of the inoculated animal.
The coagulation time of the blood is generally prolonged during the acute stage of lobar pneumonia, returning to normal during the period of convalescence. There seems to be a simultaneous increase in the quantity of circulating fibrinogen. The lengthening of the coagulation time is probably due to an increased formation of antithrombin. The source of the increased antithrombin and fibrinogen is probably the liver, and the stimulus to increased production of these two substances is due to the nature of the infecting organism.
A diminution in the carbon dioxide content of the blood is a constant feature in pneumonia. Occasional cases, however, may fail to show low carbon dioxide. The carbon dioxide in the blood bears little definite relation to the severity of the disease, except that it tends to be lowest in severe cases and in the terminal stages of the disease. There is less deviation from the normal in short or mild cases. The diminution in the carbon dioxide in the blood bears no immediate relation to temperature, as it may persist for some days after the patient is afebrile. The diminution in carbon dioxide corresponds to the other evidences of metabolic changes in infection and, like them, may be even greater after than during the febrile period. The changes in the carbon dioxide content of the blood run parallel to the output of ammonia in the urine. The carbon dioxide appears to bear no relation to chlorine excretion. In two unusual cases the carbon dioxide content of the blood was normal or above normal. This was associated with a very low oxygen content of the venous blood.
The most striking feature observed in this study is the extensive variation of the serum in relation to its proteins. It was found that in certain diseases the globulin fraction is markedly increased, whereas the total protein of the serum may be normal, or may fall far below normal in amount. The diseases in which an increase in the globulins takes place may be grouped as follows: (1) cardiac diseases associated with decompensation and serous effusions, (2) pulmonary or respiratory affections of inflammatory or non-inflammatory origin (pneumonia, emphysema, polycythemia), (3) diabetes mellitus, and (4) parenchymatous nephritis. In the serum of chronic parenchymatous nephritis the increase in the globulin content is most pronounced and may constitute nearly all the protein, or as much as 95 per cent. The globulin content of serum is normal or diminished in the following diseases: (1) simple achylia gastrica (short duration), (2) tuberculosis, (3) diabetes insipidus, and (4) chronic interstitial nephritis. Other ingredients of the sera analyzed showed variations which cannot be definitely classified; but in a general way it appears upon careful analysis that an accumulation of water and salt occurs in those diseases in which the globulin fraction of the blood serum is increased.
IT MAY BE CONCLUDED FROM THE RESULTS OBTAINED IN THESE EXPERIMENTS : 1. That stimulation of the right vagus nerve in the dog usually causes arrest of all the chambers of the heart. 2. That stimulation of the left vagus nerve exerts a moderate negative chronotropic effect on the auricles. 3. That stimulation of the left vagus nerve has a profound effect on the conduction of impulses over the auriculoventricular system. 4. That the degree of effect exercised on the auriculoventricular system by stimulation of the left vagus nerve varies. In some dogs conduction is depressed to an extent which causes only a delay in the conduction of impulses from auricles to ventricles (P-R time) ; in other dogs the conduction is depressed to a degree which results in incomplete heart-block; while in still other dogs conduction is so depressed that although the auricles continue to contract, no impulses pass from them to the ventricles. 5. That when stimulation of either the right or left vagus nerve causes asystole of nomotopic ventricular contractions, ectopic ventricular contractions may occur. 6. That the time which elapses before ectopic ventricular contractions occur depends upon the irritability of the ventricular muscle, and this may vary in different dogs. 7. That stimulation of the left vagus nerve may rarely cause sino-auricular block. Possibly stimulation of the right nerve may also produce this effect. 8. That there is consequently usually a great qualitative difference in the action of the two vagus nerves on the heart of the dog.
THE RESULTS OF THIS STUDY OF THE CHANGES IN THE BLOOD AFTER SPLENECTOMY AND OF THE EFFECT OF THE ADMINISTRATION OF HEMOLYTIC SERUM ALLOW THE FOLLOWING TENTATIVE CONCLUSIONS: 1. The failure of a hemolytic serum to cause jaundice is due in some way to the anemia which frequently follows splenectomy. Animals, whether splenectomized or not, which have a low blood count and low hemoglobin content do not readily develop jaundice after administration of a hemolytic serum. On the other hand, in animals with a normal blood picture such a serum readily causes, during early periods after splenectomy, a well marked jaundice. 2. The difficulty of producing hemoglobinemia and jaundice in animals splenectomized one month or more, is due, as shown by blood count, the use of hypotonic salt solution test, and by the search for the presence of hemoglobin in the serum and urine, to an increase in the resistance of the red cells. The results of detailed serologic tests upon this point will be presented later. 3. It is possible that spontaneous jaundice occurring at long periods after splenectomy is an accompaniment of the complete regeneration of the blood. The study of the blood in animals splenectomized for long periods, seven to ten months, indicates that spontaneous jaundice occurs only when the animal has recovered from the initial period of anemia and has a high red cell count and high hemoglobin content. 4. As to the mechanism responsible for the anemia following splenectomy and for the increased resistance of the red cells, we can at present offer no explanation.
1. The erythrocytes of splenectomized dogs show increased resistance to the action of hypotonic salt solutions and to specific hemolytic immune serum. The degree of resistance appears to increase with the length of time that has elapsed after splenectomy. 2. This increased resistance of the erythrocytes is not due to an increased antihemolytic power of the animal's serum or to a diminished complementary value of the serum, but is a property depending upon the erythrocytes themselves. 3. Non-splenectomized animals receiving a single injection of specific hemolytic immune serum and developing a temporary anemia show likewise on recovery an increased resistance of the corpuscles without the presence of antihemolysin in demonstrable amount. 4. As anemia of varying grade is a characteristic result of splenectomy, it would appear that the increased resistance of the corpuscles is a concomitant of the regeneration of the red cells following such anemia and is thus analogous to the increased resistance of such cells not infrequently observed in various forms of experimental anemia. 5. There is no evidence to indicate that the anemia after splenectomy is due to the presence of hemolytic bodies, or that the increased resistance of the cells is due to antihemolytic bodies, accumulating in the serum as the result of the ablation of the spleen. It is evident therefore that the spleen in some way controls or regulates blood destruction (and regeneration ?), and in the hope of throwing light on the subject, an investigation of the bone marrow and lymph nodes of splenectomized dogs is now under way.
In a large proportion of dogs that have been splenectomized for periods of two weeks or more, one finds a great increase in the number of endothelial cells of the lymph nodes. In most splenectomized dogs that succumb to an injection of hemolytic immune serum within forty-eight hours, the sinuses of the lymph nodes contain large numbers of endothelial cells, phagocytic for red cells. This is not seen in normal dogs receiving hemolytic serum. Likewise a similar power of phagocytosis is seen frequently in the stellate cells of the capillaries of the liver. Both in the lymph nodes and the liver these cells appear to be formed in situ; we find no evidence that they have been transported to these organs. Such findings suggest the development of a compensatory function on the part of the lymph nodes and possibly of the liver. Normally the spleen contains cells which have the power to engulf and presumably to destroy the red blood corpuscles. In certain pathological conditions this function is frequently greatly augmented and may sometimes be shared by the lymph nodes, for example, in typhoid fever, as was first clearly shown by Mallory. Our observations suggest that in the absence of the spleen, this function of forming red blood corpuscle-phagocyting cells, normally a minor activity of the lymph nodes, becomes highly developed in the latter organs, and that these cells, and the stellate cells of the liver, thus assume, in part at least, the function of destroying red blood corpuscles by phagocytosis. In view of the somewhat limited material at our disposal, we offer this, not as definitely conclusive, but as evidence which, in connection with the work of others, is highly suggestive of the possibility of the lymph nodes assuming some of the function of the spleen. Whether this activity of the endothelial cells of the lymph nodes and the liver has any bearing on the anemia that follows splenectomy and on the occurrence of spontaneous jaundice in the late periods after splenectomy, is not yet clear.
It will be seen that uranium nephritis, which involves both tubules and glomeruli, the former more markedly than the latter, produces a marked accumulation of nitrogen in the blood. Chromate nephritis, which involves almost exclusively the tubules, produces only moderate retention of nitrogen. Cantharidin nephritis which involves both tubules and glomeruli, the latter more severely than does uranium, produces a marked accumulation of nitrogen, beginning early and persisting for a considerable period. The experiments were controlled by testing the blood of normal cats kept under the same conditions, these animals showing only slight variations from day to day. This general statement is in accordance with the physiological classification of these nephritides except that the retention in uranium occurs at an early stage, where, according to the physiological studies of Schlayer and his associates, and of Pearce, Hill, and Eisenbrey, the vascular changes have not as yet appeared. It must be noticed that in the three types of nephritis that form the subject of this investigation, anatomical study shows the glomerulus to be distinctly involved in the two forms where accumulation of nitrogen in the blood is most marked, a condition indicating that although almost pure tubular involvement produces only moderate accumulation, the additional involvement of the glomerulus is extremely important in leading to a retention of nitrogenous waste products. The accumulation of non-protein nitrogen in the blood and tissues is not large when compared with the total intake or elimination of nitrogen, and consequently it is practically impossible by means of ordinary nitrogen equilibrium experiments to demonstrate the fact of the retention, to say nothing of determining the degree of accumulation of waste products accompanying nephritis. That both can be demonstrated by the method employed in this research is clearly shown by the figures recorded ablove.
As a result of this study it may be stated that primary splenomegaly of the Gaucher type is a distinct disease, related in all probability to the blood diseases. It begins usually at an early age, frequently affects several members of a family, and runs a chronic course. The clinical manifestations are: pronounced hypertrophy of the spleen, subsequent enlargement of the liver, absence of palpable lymph nodes, absence of jaundice and ascites, absence of characteristic blood changes, discoloration or pigmentation of the skin, and a tendency to epistaxis or other hemorrhages. The lesions are found in the spleen, lymph nodes, bone marrow, and liver. These organs show the presence of iron-containing pigment, and large multinuclear cells with a characteristic cytoplasm. In the early cases peculiar large phagocytic cells arising from atypical large lymphocytes are found in the follicles (keimcentra) of the hemapoietic system. After leaving the follicles these cells possess phagocytic qualities for a certain period. As a result of the phagocytosisthe cells enlarge, the nature of the cytoplasm changes, and the cells acquire a characteristic vacuolated and wrinkled appearance. The cells are carried from the spleen through the portal system to the liver, where they are destroyed. The irritation produced by this destructive process gives rise to an increase in the intralobular connective tissue. The disease is eminently a chronic one, without any of the manifestations of malignancy, and always terminating as the result of some intercurrent affection. The etiology is unknown, although a family predisposition to some toxic agent which causes an irritability of the follicles in the hemapoietic system probably exists. The possibility of some protozoan infection as an etiological factor must not be overlooked.
The domestic fly (Musca domestica) can carry the virus of poliomyelitis in an active state for several days upon the surface of the body and for several hours within the gastro-intestinal tract. Mosquitos (Culex pipiens, Culex sollicitans, and Culex cantator), in our experiments, have not taken up and maintained in a living state the virus from the spinal cord of monkeys. Lice (Pediculus capitis and Pediculus vestimenti) have not taken the virus out of the blood of monkeys or maintained it in a living state. The bedbug (Cimex lectularius) has taken the virus with the blood from infected monkeys and maintained it in a living state within the body for a period of seven days.
1. Leucoprotease splits pneumococci into lower cleavage products than are obtained with the autolytic ferment contained in the pneumococci. 2. Such cleavage products injected into rabbits have the property of producing immune bodies in the blood of the injected animals. 3. These experiments indicate that proteolysis plays a part in the production of pneumococcus immunity.
In the thirty-two unselected cases studied, cultures were taken from both the blood and the sputum, and in five of these more than one blood culture was taken. In one case the culture was taken from the blood only, and in this instance the pneumococcus was found. This case will be considered only with reference to the incidence of the pneumococci in blood cultures in lobar pneumonia. The results in the thirty-two cases in which cultures were made both from the blood and the sputum are as follows: 1. In eleven cases the blood and sputum cultures were positive. (a) In nine cases the pneumococcus was isolated, and five of these patients died. (b) In two cases, instead of the pneumococcus, Streptococcus hemolysans (longus) was found. One of these patients died. 2. In twenty-one cases the blood cultures were negative, and in eighteen of these the sputum cultures were positive and in three negative. In these three the only result recorded was the absence of the pneumococcus. (a) In nine cases the pneumococcus was isolated. Two of these patients died. (b) In twelve cases no pneumococcus was found. Two of these patients died. Of the patients in which no pneumococcus was found, in two cases Bacillus coli was isolated; in one case Micrococcus catarrhalis; in one case a staphylococcus (type not stated); in two cases staphylococcus and streptococcus; in one case Bacillus influenzae, in one case Bacillus fluorescens non-liquefaciens; in one case an unidentified Gram positive chromogenic organism, probably saprophytic; and in three cases there are no recorded results except that the pneumococcus was absent. In the total of thirty-three blood cultures, the pneumococcus was found in ten cases (30.3 per cent.), and six of the patients died. During the years 1910 to 1912 sputum cultures were taken from forty-four cases of pneumonia, of which twenty-four showed pneumococci (54 per cent.), and twenty showed no pneumococci (45 per cent.).
Pancreatic tissue implanted in the spleen and separated from its original vascular and nervous connections can live and functionate for months. A small nodule of pancreatic tissue composed of acini without demonstrable islands of Langerhans prevented the development of diabetes. Death occurred 187 days after the extirpation of the pancreas.
Closed duodenal loops may be made in dogs by ligatures placed just below the pancreatic duct and just beyond the duodenojejunal junction, together with a posterior gastro-enterostomy. These closed duodenal loop dogs die with symptoms like those of patients suffering from volvulus or high intestinal obstruction. This duodenal loop may simulate closely a volvulus in which there has been no vascular disturbance. Dogs with closed duodenal loops which have been washed out carefully survive a little longer on the average than animals with unwashed loops. The duration of life in the first instance is one to three days, with an average of about forty-eight hours. The dogs usually lose considerable fluid by vomiting and diarrhea. A weak pulse, low blood pressure and temperature are usually conspicuous in the last stages. Autopsy shows more or less splanchnic congestion which may be most marked in the mucosa of the upper small intestine. The peritoneum is usually clear and the closed loop may be distended with thin fluid, or collapsed, and contain only a small amount of pasty brown material. The mucosa of the loop may show ulceration and even perforation, but in the majority of cases it is intact and exhibits only a moderate congestion. Simple intestinal obstruction added to a closed duodenal loop does not modify the result in any manner, but it may hasten the fatal outcome. The liver plays no essential role as a protective agent against this poison, for a dog with an Eck fistula may live three days with a closed loop. A normal dog reacts to intraportal injection and to intravenous injection of the toxic substance in an identical manner. Drainage of this loop under certain conditions may not interfere with the general health over a period of weeks or months. Excision of the part of the duodenum included in this loop causes no disturbance. The material from the closed duodenal loops contains no bile, pancreatic juice, gastric juice, or split products from the food. It can be formed in no other way than by the activity of the intestinal mucosa and the growth of the intestinal bacteria. This material after dilution, autolysis, sterilization, and filtration produces a characteristic effect when introduced intravenously. When in toxic doses it causes a profound drop in blood pressure, general collapse, drop in temperature, salivation, vomiting, and profuse diarrhea, which is often blood-stained. Splanchnic congestion is the conspicuous feature at autopsy and shows especially in the villi of the duodenal and jejunal mucosae. Adrenalin, during this period of low blood pressure and splanchnic congestion, will cause the usual reaction when given intravenously, but applied locally or given intravenously it causes no bleaching of the engorged intestinal mucosa. Secretin is not found in the duodenal loop fluid, and the loop material does not influence the pancreatic secretion. Intraportal injection of the toxic material gives a reaction similar to intravenous injection. Intraperitoneal and subcutaneous injections produce a relatively slow reaction which closely resembles the picture seen in the closed duodenal loop dog. In both cases there is a relatively slow absorption, but the splanchnic congestion and other findings, though less intense, are present in both groups. There seems, therefore, to be no escape from the conclusion that a poisonous substance is formed in this closed duodenal loop which is absorbed from it and causes intoxication and death. Injection of this toxic substance into a normal dog gives intoxication and a reaction more intense but similar to that developing in a closed-loop dog.
The blood of closed duodenal loop dogs is not toxic to normal dogs. The blood of dogs that have been fatally poisoned with duodenal loop fluid is likewise non-toxic to normal dogs. The mucosa of closed or drained duodenal loops contains a toxic substance quite similar to the toxic material found in the lumen of the closed loops. This toxic substance is absorbed from the mucosa itself and not from the lumen of the drained loops. The same is probably true of the closed loops which have an intact mucosa. It seems highly probable that the poison is formed by the mucosa and is in great part absorbed directly from it by the blood. Normal intestinal mucosa contains no toxic substance nor can it neutralize in vitro the toxic substance produced in the closed loops. There is no evidence that the toxic material when given intravenously is excreted by the intestine or held by the intestinal mucosa in any demonstrable form. The toxic substance is not absorbed from the normal intestinal tract. Destruction of the mucosa in a closed loop by means of sodium fluoride prevents the formation of the toxic substance. This fact furnishes the final proof that the mucosa is the essential factor in the elaboration of the poisonous material.
1. Cholesterin, whether suspended in dilute alcohol or in sodium oleate solution, when injected directly into tumors causes a marked acceleration both of the primary and of the metastatic growth. 2. The acceleration of the growth of the primary tumor by cholesterin is most evident in the premetastatic stage. 3. Lecithin, when injected in the form of an aqueous emulsion directly into tumors, diminishes the tendency to form metastases, retards the metastatic growth when it does occur, and in some instances also retards the primary growth. 4. The retardation due to lecithin is most evident in the metastatic stage. 5. Simultaneous injection of M/6 strontium chloride solution into the tumors does not appreciably affect the action of the lecithin.
The intrabronchial insufflation of a non-virulent pneumococcus causes, like the insufflation of a virulent pneumococcus, the development of an exudate in the lungs which, in general, leaves the framework unaffected, and the lesion presents the gross appearance of a lobar pneumonia. It differs, however, materially from the pneumonia produced by virulent pneumococci in the important points that the consolidation tends to a more rapid resolution, the disease is non-fatal, the blood is not invaded by the organism, and the exudate is strikingly poor in fibrin. As to the question which was the starting point for the foregoing investigation, namely, whether the pneumonic lesion produced by the streptococcus is merely a form of pneumonia caused by a less virulent organism, it may be answered for the dog, it seems, in the negative. The leucocytic infiltration of the framework of the lungs which occurs invariably in streptococcus pneumonia, and which is practically absent in the lesions caused by the virulent as well as by the non-virulent pneumococcus, is a strong enough feature to form a dividing line between the two forms of experimental pneumonia previously described.
While one can not assert that the conclusions which experiments appear to offer must of necessity correspond to the conditions which arise clinically in man, nevertheless these results, if definite, must tend to show the direction in which the truth lies. The conclusions which may be drawn from this research are as follows: 1. Direct infection of the medulla of a long bone is unlikely to lead to the development of a tuberculous osteomyelitis. 2. Inoculation of the interior of a joint with tubercle bacilli readily produces tubercle of the synovial membrane. 3. From such an infected joint the epiphysis or metaphysis of the bone becomes diseased. 4. Infection of the arterial heart blood does not result in the local development of tubercle of the bones or joints. 5. Infection of the main artery supplying a limb leads to the development of tuberculous disease of certain of the joints of that limb. 6. Direct infection of the nutrient artery does not result in tuberculous osteomyelitis of the bone.
The first specimen of Ammocoetes branchialis that showed histologically any atrophic changes in the endostyle was taken on July 16. These changes proceeded relatively rapidly for about a month, after which the endostyle as such was no longer recognized. All specimens examined after August 15 showed in cross section the characteristic ductless follicles more or less completely formed. More gradual and minor changes in the way of further absorption of cell remnants and completion of the follicles continued at least until September 1. Two specimens taken from the creek on September 4, 1911. showed complete follicle formation with some stainable colloid (figures 14 and 15). There was still yellow granular pigment in the fibrous tissue between the follicles. In two specimens taken on October 14, 1909, the pigment was absent and the follicles were more closely set, larger, and contained homogenous colloid. In the twenty-four specimens of ammocoetes studied, there were variations in the time of the onset of metamorphosis. There may also be variations in the rate of progress of the changes in different specimens. There is no evidence that removal of the animals from their native environment to the laboratory either increases or decreases the rate of metamorphosis. Schneider states that he was unable to get specimens kept in the laboratory to undergo metamorphosis. Gage, however, has repeatedly observed the metamorphosis under laboratory conditions, and the six of our specimens kept in the laboratory-some for forty days-remained in excellent condition and the metamorphosis proceeded as well as in those living in the creek. I know of no observations bearing on the question as to whether the metamorphosis may be hastened or delayed as it can be in tadpoles and other amphibia. It is probable, however, that physical conditions greatly influence the transformation. These observations as to the length of time from the inception to the completion of metamorphosis indicate that a month and probably longer is necessary for the lake and brook lampreys of Central New York. This is in agreement with the observations of Gage and of Muller on metamorphosis in general, but is at variance with the views of Bujor, who states that the process takes place within three to four days. The first endostylar changes are a gradual shrinkage in the whole organ with thickening of the capsule and septum and proliferation of the connective tissue in the periendostylar zone. The tongue anlage is developed in this thickening just dorsal to the endostyle and anterior to the gland orifice. The size of the chambers progressively decreases and with the thickening of the septum the halves of the endostyle are both absolutely and relatively more separated. All the five types of epithelia are affected, the first to show the change being type I, the four fan-shaped bundles of cuneiform cells of each half of the endostyle. These disappear totally quite early. The next type to show marked changes is type III, or the cells with yellow pigment granules. Here the change is progressive and these cell groups in different stages of atrophy may be traced through to the fully developed follicles. The epithelium of type V, or the endothelial-like lining of the parietal walls of the chambers, is piled up and extruded laterally as the chambers contract or shrink. These cells in different stages of atrophy may be followed until the metamorphosis is nearing completion. It is certain that the cells of types I, III, and V play no part in the formation of the ductless follicles. With types II and IV the question is not so easily settled as it is from one or the other or from both of these types that the permanent follicles arise. One can say definitely that type IV plays the major role, but whether the cells of type II after fusion with the basal group of type IV do not also share in the formation of the ventral follicle of the given chamber, I cannot decide, but from the evidence obtainable this seems probable. It is significant that the cells of type IV are continuous with, and indistinguishable from, the cells lining the orifice and are continued anteriorly in the deep pharyngeal groove and peripharyngeal grooves as well as posteriorally from the orifice in the small pharyngeal groove. As to the fate of this extraglandular epithelium of type IV I have no data save that with the closing of the orifice and the formation of the permanent branchial sac these grooves with their ciliated epithelium disappear and the whole sac comes to be lined with plain stratified epithelium. The fact that the cells of the pharyngeal grooves and the lining cells of the gland orifice are continuous with the cells of the endostyle from which the permanent thyroid follicles are formed is not without significance in relation to the development of the thyroid of the higher chordates. One or more very large follicles are formed from the lower portion of this orificial epithelium of type IV. Four ductless follicles are the maximum number that may be formed primarily in each half of the endostyle from the four areas of epithelium of type IV. From the specimens studied this maximum is frequently not obtained. Posterior to the orifice where four chambers exist, each corresponding to one half of an anterior chamber, but two follicles may be formed from each chamber, but in the coil these are proportionately increased, in cross section. Most of the detailed studies here recorded have been made on the part of the endostyle posterior to the coil where the simplest conditions exist. Here two follicles are ordinarily formed from each chamber. In cross sections the follicles are at first only long tubules whose cavities are the remnants of the original endostyle chambers, but when the metamorphosis is completed each of these primary tubules is cut up into several elongated closed sacs corresponding to the true ductless follicles of all higher chordates. New follicles also arise by budding from these primary ones, and this process is probably of normal occurrence at the metamorphosis.
1. An extract of horse leucocytes is strongly bactericidal when dissolved in distilled water; it has considerable bactericidal power when dissolved in physiological saline; but it loses its bactericidal properties when mixed with blood serum or with normal or pathological tissue fluids. 2. About half the antibactericidal action of blood serum is due to the serum colloids, about a quarter to the neutral serum crystalloids, and a quarter to the diffusible alkalies. Diffusible acids have no antibactericidal action. 3. The addition of boric acid to an inactive mixture of leucocytic extract and serum or other body fluid occasionally restores part of the original bactericidal power, but never more than a small fraction of that power.
The experiments show that intrabronchial insufflation of a culture of virulent pneumococcus killed by heat and still containing stainable organisms produces an inextensive, mild, patchy, superficial inflammation of the lung tissue bearing no similarity to the lesions produced by the living pneumococcus, and that insufflation of sterile bouillon causes a pronounced congestion of the lung tissue with which it comes in contact, sometimes lasting for forty-eight hours.
An abnormal auricular activity is produced by faradization of the right auricle of the dog, which frequently becomes established and continues for varying periods of time after faradization is discontinued. This auricular activity consists of a rapid auricular tachycardia coexisting with true auricular fibrillation. In some dogs the auricles are thrown into this abnormal activity more readily by faradization after the vagi have been cut than before. Cutting the nerves has little or no effect on the abnormal auricular activity, but the ventricular rate may be much increased if the vagi are cut after the abnormal auricular activity has been established, apparently because of an improvement in the auriculoventricular conductivity. Stimulation of the right vagus nerve changes the character of the activity of the faradized auricles by inhibiting the auricular tachycardia while the fibrillation is uninfluenced. Stimulation of the left vagus nerve has little or no apparent inhibitory effect on the auricular tachycardia, but has possibly an inhibitory effect on the auricular fibrillation. Vagus stimulation increases the susceptibility of the auricles to faradization. The abnormal activity set up by faradization may be established in hearts otherwise refractory by vagus stimulation of short duration following the faradization. Vagus stimulation usually holds the auricles in the abnormal activity set up by faradization as long as it is continued in hearts in which, without vagus stimulation, the sequential beat always returns as soon as faradization is stopped. The right vagus is more effectual in this respect than the left. In some hearts vagus stimulation alone is capable of initiating the same abnormal auricular activity which is caused by auricular faradization. The normal sequential beat is often restored by vagus stimulation. It replaces the abnormal auricular activity not during, but a few seconds after, the termination of vagus stimulation. Left vagus stimulation is somewhat more effectual in producing this result than right vagus stimulation.
The following conclusions may be drawn from the results obtained in this study. 1. In the minor surgical cases (considered normal) the chemical composition of the blood serum agrees, as far as its proteins are concerned, with the usual standard values. When examined at different times, the serum of such cases shows no variation in the total protein content or in its individual fractions. The incoagulable nitrogen, however, varies considerably in the total amount in the different cases, as well as in its percentage relations to the other constituents of the serum. 2. The cases of prostatic hypertrophy, with or without chronic interstitial nephritis, show no change from the normal in the character of the protein composition of the serum, nor in the ratio which the individual fractions bear to each other. On the other hand, the incoagulable and non-protein nitrogen of the serum show marked fluctuations, some of which correspond to the degree of functional deficiency of the kidneys. 3. In cases of localized infections of the kidneys, the changes in the blood serum are twofold. One concerns the proteins, and is traceable to the infection; and the other concerns the non-protein nitrogen, results from functional impairment, and varies with the amount of destruction of the kidney substance. Thus an increase in the globulins is observed in these sera similar to that occurring in infections in other localities; the non-protein content increases apparently in direct proportion to the degree of deficiency of the kidney, and becomes diminished when the function of the kidneys improves.
1. A single intravenous injection into dogs of a sufficient number of freshly washed typhoid bacteria produces the symptoms and pathology that characterize anaphylaxis in these animals. 2. These effects are not produced by the coagulable protein-free filtrate from a fresh emulsion, while a similar filtrate from an emulsion digested with leucoprotease is very potent, the toxic portion of the bacterial bodies being changed from a coagulable to a non-coagulable state. 3. The symptoms and pathology described are not specific, since they can be produced by substances other than typhoid toxins. 4. Digestion with leucoprotease furnishes a method of liberating toxic substances from typhoid bacteria resembling the processes of nature more closely than the methods heretofore used. 5. The toxic substances thus liberated are not destroyed by a heat and acid precipitation of the coagulable proteins, and are of the nature of primary proteoses.
An osteochondrosarcoma of the common fowl, designated in this laboratory as Chicken Tumor VII, has been successfully transplanted to seven successive series of hosts. The original growth contained bone and cartilage, was attached to the sternal keel of an otherwise healthy chicken, and appeared to have arisen from this structure. In the growths derived from its transplantation cartilage is regularly laid down, followed later by bone in case the host lives long enough. The prechondral tissue consists of spindle-shaped or multipolar cells of the fibroblast type. The histological character and the behavior of this prechondral tissue show that it is sarcomatous, a fact further proven by one recent case in which the tumor has metastasized. The secondary growth in this instance consisted of prechondral tissue in which a cartilaginous change was taking place. The tumor could not be transferred to pigeons, the one foreign species tested, but grew readily in chickens of two alien breeds. Reinoculation experiments suggest the occurrence of a natural, individual immunity, and of a certain degree of acquired resistance. In one fowl visceral growths developed following an intravenous injection of tumor emulsion, although whether they were due to this cause or were secondary to the large implantation growths in the muscles is uncertain. Recently the tumor has been transmitted by means of the filtrate from a Berkefeld filter.
Inoculation of the Jensen rat sarcoma into the developing chick embryo gives a rapidly growing tumor at the site of inoculation, whether in the membranes or in the body of the chick itself. These tumors by transfer from embryo to embryo can be kept going for as long as forty-six days, and perhaps indefinitely in the foreign species. The rat cells show no morphological change even after a very long dependence. Their biological characters are also retained, as is shown by the fact that the cells when replanted in the rat, after a prolonged sojourn in the chick, will produce a rapidly growing sarcoma of the Jensen type. These rat tissues grown for long periods in the chick show no adaptation to the new species, being destroyed even more rapidly when placed in the adult chicken than cells taken directly from the rat. Morphologically the cells retain a close resemblance to those in the original tumor. Other tissues grown in chick embryo are various embryonic cells from the chicken, mouse, and rat, the Ehrlich sarcoma and chondroma of the mouse, a mammary carcinoma of the mouse, the Flexner-Jobling adenocarcinoma of the rat, and a human sarcoma.
1. In primary cultures sarcoma cells exhibit a much greater activity than do normal connective tissue cells grown from the adult blood vessel; there is a shorter latent period, ameboid phenomena are more marked, and cell multiplication proceeds more rapidly. 2. In secondary cultures sarcoma cells are less active than in primary cultures; connective tissue cells, on the other hand, show a markedly accelerated growth. 3. Connective tissue cells are more easily propagated over long periods in vitro than are sarcoma cells; they multiply actively in cultures more than three months old. 4. The method of tissue cultivation is well adapted to the study of normal and pathological cell division; the nuclear changes are easily discernible in the living cell as division proceeds, and staining methods may be applied to verify observations upon the unstained structures. 5. Atypical mitoses of several kinds are found in cultures of sarcoma cells but are not seen in growths of connective tissue. 6. The time required for division in rat connective tissue cells kept at body temperature (38 degrees C.) varies within relatively narrow limits (twenty to fifty minutes); sarcoma cells, on the contrary, exhibit marked variations and several hours may be required. 7. In studies upon living cells amitotic division has not been observed in either normal or tumor tissue. Evidences of nuclear budding, however, with the formation of cells containing several nuclei of irregular size have been noted.(3) The development of a cell with two nuclei from a mononuclear cell by mitotic division of the nucleus without division of the cytoplasm has also been observed.
1. The reported successful transfer of scarlet fever to both higher and lower monkeys is not definitely established. 2. In the course of the experiments here reported, the infectious agent can be assumed to have been carried over to the monkeys. The failure to cause infection probably proceeds from the insusceptibility of the monkeys employed, or to the manner of introducing the agent. 3. The temperature curve and leucocyte count of monkeys are unsatisfactory criteria for the diagnosis of disease in those animals. 4. Monkeys frequently have transient blotchy, erythematous eruptions on the face and neck, and almost always a bran-like desquamation. 5. Monkeys are highly resistant to infection with microorganisms from human beings.
It is obvious, as stated in the beginning, that these experiments have failed to reproduce a chronic pulmonary tuberculosis. Acute pneumonic processes of tubercular origin are, however, not infrequent as a complicating or terminal process in pulmonary phthisis, and there have been several cases described in which individuals have died with the symptom complex of acute lobar pneumonia, in which it developed at post-mortem examination that the disease was tuberculosis. Our experiments throw some light on debated questions in connection with these acute pneumonic forms of phthisis. In our experiments we believe that we have effectively reproduced this exudative type of tuberculosis of the lungs. This type of lesion may, in the light of our experiments, result from the sudden bronchogenic invasion of large numbers of virulent tubercle bacilli in a relatively resistant animal. The large mononuclear cells so frequently encountered in the exudate seem to be brought there chiefly from outside.(1) As Orth found when studying human material, it is difficult here also, to exclude the possibility that similar cells may result from the desquamation of alveolar epithelium. The tubercle bacillus alone, without the aid of secondary infection, is competent to produce a type of lesion which leads to necrosis of the bronchi, and by discharge of the necrotic material to cavity formation. As judged by our experiments the bronchi are less resistant to involvement in the necrosis than are the blood vessels or pleural surfaces. The fact that by the method of bronchial insufflation of Lamar and Meltzer a characteristic tuberculous pneumonia may be produced makes it probable that the lobar pneumonias generally are of bronchogenic origin.
This study of globin and its compound with casein (globin caseinate) shows that globin fails to produce fixation antibodies in rabbits after repeated injections, thus agreeing with our own work and with that of others with similar histon bodies which are primarily toxic. When globin is combined with casein, however, it gives rise to antibodies that react not only with globin caseinate and casein but also with globin. The antibodies in antiglobin casein serum are apparently separate, one for globin and one for casein. In other words, the change in globin undergone on combination with casein has apparently rendered it antigenic. We did not succeed in demonstrating the genesis of this new antigenic property by anaphylaxis experiments. A further investigation of similar and more complex combined proteins is indicated and gives promise of more light on the nature of biological specificity.
Although the study of experimental nephritis by physiological methods shows that the most striking effect of cantharidin is injury of the blood vessels, the great abundance of mitotic figures in the tubular epithelium in the stage of repair points to an equally widespread and severe epithelial injury. Caution must therefore be observed in ascribing the physiological disturbances of kidney function caused by cantharidin as due exclusively to a vascular injury, and in regarding cantharidin nephritis as a pure type of vascular nephritis.
1. Mallory's connective tissue stain used in connection with fixation of tissue by Zenker's fluid or bichloride of mercury demonstrates the presence or absence of iodin in the thyroid colloid, as is evidenced by parallel chemical determinations, iodin feeding, and test-tube experiments. 2. Greatly increased activity of the heart is accompanied by a loss of thyro-iodin from the colloid of the thyroid. 3. This method, while apparently not adaptable to clinical use, may prove of value in further experimental work on the thyroid.
The data brought together in this report have been gathered from a wide territory and for a period extending over several years. The antimeningitis serum was first employed in 1906 and the latest figures relating to its use included in this report were furnished in 1912. There is no longer doubt that the serum has come to be applied under conditions fairly representing all known manifestations of epidemic meningitis. Hence the test of the serum treatment may be regarded as having been a rigorous one. The initial difficulties surrounding the administration by direct subdural injection have been largely overcome and doubtless will be still further mastered. Already the serum is being successfully applied in private as well as in hospital practice. This gain will probably be reflected in a still further diminution of the mortality since early injection plays such a large part in determining the results achieved. The 1,300 cases studied in this report are a part only of a far greater number of cases actually treated with the serum supplied by the Rockefeller Institute. It was not found possible to secure histories of all the cases treated; but there is no reason to suppose that the results of the analysis would have been essentially different if reports of a still larger number of cases had been returned. The decision arrived at is not based upon statistical computations alone, but upon objective data as well that are not readily misinterpreted. The conclusion that follows was first stated in 1909 as the result of an analysis of 400 serum-treated cases. It is supported by the study of the larger series of cases just presented. "In view of the various considerations presented, the conclusion may be drawn that the antimeningitis serum, when used by the subdural method of injection, in suitable doses and at proper intervals, is capable of reducing the period of illness; of preventing, in large measure, the chronic lesions and types of the infection; of bringing about complete restoration of health, in all but a very small number of the recovered, thus lessening the serious, deforming, and permanent consequences of meningitis; and of greatly diminishing the fatalities due to the disease."
A pet dog developed a form of paralysis simulating the paralysis of epidemic poliomyelitis. The autopsy showed changes in the spinal cord and intervertebral ganglia, resembling, but not identical with, the lesions of poliomyelitis in man. Inoculation of the affected spinal cord into the nervous system of young dogs and Macacus rhesus monkeys was not followed by the production of paralysis or other obvious symptom of disease.
The reduction of the oxygen capacity which occurs after incubating pneumococcus cultures with washed rabbit corpuscles is due to the formation of methemoglobin (or some derivative of hemoglobin with identical optical constants for three regions in the spectrum). The substance which induces the change is also present in the sterile filtrate of autolyzed cultures. By analogy we feel justified in concluding that the mechanism of the reduction of the oxygen capacity in human lobar pneumonia is at least in part of the same nature. To determine the frequency and intensity of the phenomenon in lobar pneumonia, and thereby to establish its clinical significance, is the next step and a problem upon which we are now engaged.
Normal and Eck fistula dogs react in a similar manner to the intravenous injection of hemoglobin obtained from laked red cells of the same animal. Hemoglobin appears in the urine after a few minutes and bile pigments in one to one and one half hours. In this simple type of hematogenous jaundice the reaction is in no way influenced by shutting out the portal blood from the liver and cutting down its blood supply to about 25 per cent. of normal. In a second type of hematogenous jaundice produced by chloroform anesthesia, which produces central liver necrosis, there is no essential difference between the normal and Eck fistula dog. The Eck fistula dog, as a rule, is more resistant to this poison, but, given a definite liver necrosis, the jaundice developing will reach its maximum on the second day as in the normal animal. This jaundice must be explained in part by capillary biliary obstruction, but in part by a hemolysin formed in the injured liver cells (Joannovics and Pick). Simple obstruction of the common duct when combined with an Eck fistula gives rise to a definite low grade icterus with bile pigment constantly present in the urine. Under these conditions after doubly ligating and cutting the common duct with separation of the cut ends, the lumen of the duct may be established and bile may enter the intestine by means of a fistulous tract between the cut ends of the bile duct. The formation of bile and bile pigments is much less in an Eck fistula dog than in a normal animal and consequently the icterus is much less intense. This is probably due to a lessened activity of the liver cells because of decreased blood supply. This observation does not harmonize with the current view that bile pigments are formed solely from hemoglobin, as there is no evidence of more hemolysis in a normal than in an Eck fistula dog. This suggests that the bile pigment may be formed in part, at least, from other substances than hemoglobin, and, further, that bile pigment formation normally may depend in part upon the functional activity of the liver cell rather than upon the amount of hemoglobin supplied to it.
The intravenous injection of red cells obtained from the same animal and laked by distilled water is similar to certain types of hemolysis which result in hematogenous jaundice. This procedure cannot be criticized on the grounds of introducing toxic substances. The hemoglobin circulating in the blood stream is rapidly changed, in part at least, to bile pigment. The change goes on with practically the same rapidity in a normal circulation, in an Eck fistula animal, and in a dog with Eck fistula and hepatic artery ligation. Moreover, the bile pigment formation goes on in a dog whose liver, spleen, and intestines have been shut out of the circulation, and in those with a head and thorax circulation. In the last experiments there had been no operative manipulation of the liver and the bile pigment could not have escaped from the liver and have been absorbed by the circulation above the diaphragm; for example, by the thoracic duct. It is possible that the endothelium of the blood vessels is the agent which brings about the rapid change of hemoglobin to bile pigment. This mechanism probably comes into play when there has been a destruction of many red cells with much hemoglobin free in the plasma. We may conclude that in dogs, at least, hemoglobin can be rapidly changed into bile pigment in the circulating blood without participation of the liver.
In summarizing the findings of this paper it may be said that degenerative changes have been noted in practically every parenchymatous organ. Among these the most striking has been that of serous imbibition by the most active cells of these organs. In regard to the changes in the glands of internal secretion, the findings corroborate the statements of Cushing in regard to hypophysectomy, that removal of one gland of internal secretion results in changes in all the other glands. In this case, degenerative changes predominate in the hypophysis, thymus, ovary, and testis, while hyperplasia is seen in the islands of Langerhans and the medullas of the adrenal glands. Finally, in the rabbit athyroidism is responsible for grave degenerative changes in practically all organs and tissues of the body, and many of the symptoms of cretinism have an anatomical basis in organic cellular changes.
The experiments here recorded, as well as those preceding them and outlined in the introductory paragraphs, have had the purpose of analyzing the phenomenon of alexin fixation occurring when dissolved, unformed proteins are added to their specific antisera. The present experiments have shown that specific precipitates have the same relation to the complement fractions first described by Ferrata that are possessed by sensitized cells. In this they differ from indifferent suspensions, like kaolin, which fix alexin and its fractions indiscriminately, fixing the end-piece without dependence upon previous adsorption of the mid-piece. The writer believes this to be of theoretical importance since it seems to show, in the first place, that the fixation of alexin by precipitates is not merely a mechanical adsorption, and in that it renders more likely the supposition that the so called precipitin is actually a protein sensitizer by which a foreign protein is rendered amenable to the proteolytic action of the alexin. The visible precipitation in such reactions is merely secondary, occurring because of the colloidal nature of the reacting bodies, under conditions of quantitative proportions and environment which favor flocculation. It does not seem necessary to assume a structure for the so called precipitins essentially different from that of other sensitizers. Carried to its logical consequences, the acceptance of this view, taking the identity of agglutinins and precipitins at least as a possibility, leads to the conception that functionally there is but one variety of specific antibodies, and that is the sensitizer which makes possible the action of alexin or complement upon various antigens.
1. In a series of non-nephritic individuals the total non-protein nitrogen of the blood, determined by Folin's method, was found to lie between 15 and 43 milligrams per 100 cubic centimeters. From 50 to 60 per cent. of this was in the ammonia-urea fraction. 2. In cardiovascular disease with renal congestion, but without other renal lesion, there was no evidence of increase of non-protein nitrogen in the blood, nor of alteration of the ammonia-urea percentage. 3. In chronic nephritis with marked albuminuria and edema there was very little, if any, increase or alteration. 4. In chronic nephritis with hypertension the non-protein nitrogen was definitely increased, ranging from 40 to 180 milligrams per 100 cubic centimeters of blood. The percentage of the ammonia-urea fraction was usually higher than in non-nephritic cases. 5. Cases showing high non-protein nitrogen values were subject to rapid fluctuations in these values in the course of a few days. As a rule, clinical improvement was associated with a fall of the non-protein nitrogen figures to nearer the normal range. 6. Uremia was almost always accompanied by an increase of non-protein nitrogen in the blood, but no constant relation could be established between the degree of increase and the tendency to uremia. 7. Our cases have not yet been followed for a long enough period to admit of conclusions as to the possible relation between the degree of non-protein nitrogen retention and ultimate prognosis. 8. We believe this method to be a valuable aid in the clinical study of nephritis and that it can be readily carried out in any well equipped clinical laboratory.
The spinal fluid in the cases of acute epidemic poliomyelitis examined was usually clear, colorless, and did not appear to be under any great increase of pressure. It showed changes in the number of cells present, or in the globulin content, or in both, in the majority of cases examined on the first few days after onset of symptoms. The number of cells was usually highest during the first week, and in one case reached the figure of 1,221 per cubic millimeter. The globulin reaction was usually most marked during the third week. The number of cells diminished rapidly and was above normal in only 32 per cent. of the cases in the third week. The increase in the globulin reaction persisted to the fourth week and might be present for a considerably longer period. The cell increase was due almost invariably to mononuclear cells of various types. The lymphocytic type of cell was the most common. A high polymorphonuclear count was noted in the very early stages. All the fluids reduced Fehling's solution. The examination of the spinal fluid may be of value in diagnosis in the preparalytic stages and in abortive cases. It is not of value in prognosis as to life or ultimate recovery.
Since the purpose of this paper is to record the cultivation of amoebae upon autolyzed tissue without bacterial association, the morphological characteristics, life cycle, means of differentiating species, and pathogenicity of the protozoa have been omitted. These subjects will be considered in later publications. The result of this study proves that some species of amoebae from liver abscesses and the human intestine can be cultivated upon various autolyzed tissues of man and some of the lower animals without a symbiotic microorganism. Their cultivation from liver abscesses upon such bacteria-free autolyzed tissue indicates that their multiplication in these lesions depends upon some product or products in the process of dissociation of the liver cells. That such a process exists in amoebic liver abscesses cannot be questioned when histological and biochemical studies are made of such lesions, and this explains not only why the multiplication of the parasites in the organ occurs, but suggests the probable origin of the lesion. It has long been known that tissue kept for several days in a perfectly aseptic condition and at body heat, or preferably at slightly higher temperature undergoes softening and final disintegration of its cells. Wells and others who have made a thorough study of this phenomenon find that different enzymic actions take place in this process: thus in the liver they find that soluble nitrogen compounds are greatly increased, the nucleoproteids are altered by nuclease, the purin bases are freed and in their turn acted upon by the guanase and adenase, the fats are split and fatty acids set free, the glycogen gives rise to glucose and undergoes further splitting. lecithin is cleaved, and allied bodies appear, and there is a marked appearance of cholin and cholesterin. Similar changes varying only in degree occur in the process of autolysis of other tissues. Furthermore, Duval in his experiments upon the cultivation of Bacillus leprae found that the initial multiplication was accomplished when the specific organism was in symbiosis with an associated bacterium capable of hydrolyzing the leprous tissue. In later experiments he noted that the products of split proteins supply what is actually required for the growth of this particular obligate cell parasite, and that while this end is reached with bacteria through their proteolytic action equally good results can be obtained with tissue free from contaminating microörganisms provided that it is allowed to autolyze. The separation of amoebae cultivated from the human intestine from their bacterial symbiont, and their development upon various autolyzed tissues indicate that it is not the bacterium that is essential for the life of these protozoa, but the action of the living bacteria upon the protein contained in the media. This would explain the failure of many investigators to cultivate amoebae with dead bacteria or bacterial filtrates. Mention has been made that the autolyzed tissue used in the cultivation experiments gave a distinct acid reaction. The multiplication of amoebae upon a medium with such a reaction appears contradictory to the findings of Musgrave and Clegg, Walker, and others, who have emphasized the necessity of an alkaline medium for the successful cultivation of amoebae with a bacterial symbiont, though in accord with what is known to be the reaction of the contents from amoebic liver abscesses and of the bloody stools in intestinal amoebiosis. The fact should not be lost sight of that, in the cultivation of amoebae, these authors lay stress upon the selectiveness of amoebae for a special microörganism. A comparison of their work with our own results indicates that bacteria known to possess strong hydrolyzing properties, e. g., Vibrio cholerae, Bacillus coli, Bacillus subtilis, Vibrio proteus (Finkler-Prior), etc., furnish the best symbionts to the amoebae. It is well known that these bacteria growing upon gelatin or blood serum liquify the medium and alter its reaction to a marked degree of acidity. This acidity, for the most part, results from dissociation of the protein molecule contained in the media, for Wiener has shown that autolysis does not begin until the normal alkalinity of the tissues has been neutralized by the production of organic acids. Since experiments show that the development of the amoebae is scant or completely arrested if the autolyzed tissue is smeared upon an acid agar base or upon agar with an alkalinity higher than 1 per cent., the limit within which multiplication can occur must be small. It is possible that this explains why amoebae are so few in the center of liver abscesses where the acidity is very high and so plentiful in or near its walls where the normal tissue juices furnish a controlling influence over the acidity of the autolyzing tissue. It explains also why a neutral or a 1 to 1.5 per cent. alkaline medium is essential for the cultivation of amoebae with a bacterial symbiont. Here the necessity for a medium with an alkaline reaction seems necessary, as bacteria, especially those having high hydrolyzing properties, develop a marked acidity in the medium. If the medium possesses an initial acidity the limit is either quickly reached or already present and no multiplication occurs. On the other hand, a medium with a reaction too alkaline either inhibits the growth of symbiotic microörganisms, or neutralizes the acid products as rapidly as they are formed by the associated bacterium. Whether the amoebae cultivated from liver abscesses and from the intestinal canal upon diverse autolyzed tissues are able to produce lesions similar to those from which they were isolated, or whether they are non-pathogenic species which are accidental contaminators to those responsible for frank lesions, remains still to be determined. Experiments bearing upon these points, as well as on many others made possible by this work, are now under way.
1. It has been found that the amount of glycuronic acid excreted in the urine, estimated by Tollens's furfurol distillation method, is increased during the febrile period of almost all cases of lobar pneumonia in man. Patients weighing from fifty-five to seventy kilograms excrete during the febrile period 0.8 to 1.3 grams of glycuronic acid in twenty-four hours, while the output of a normal individual of the same weight, age, and under similar conditions would not exceed 0.4 to 0.6 of a gram. 2. This increased output is not dependent on outside factors; it is attributable to pathological changes of the organism itself during the disease. 3. Similar observations have been made in postpneumonic empyema and bronchopneumonia. 4. Fasting rabbits, with general pneumococcus infection, have also shown a marked increase in the output of glycuronic acid during the pathological process. Whether the conjugated substances with the glycuronic acid in the cases studied have the same origin and are qualitatively the same as under normal conditions, or whether we are dealing with different compounds, has not yet been determined.
1. Under normal circumstances blood platelets are largely derived from the megakaryocyte of the blood-forming organs. 2. The transitional leucocyte, representing a persistent form of the embryonic premegakaryocyte, is a circulating homologue of the megakaryocyte and probably plays some part in normal platelet formation. 3. Under conditions of excessive demand for platelet production, there may be a greater or less reversion to an embryonic mode of platelet formation in which less highly specialized cells than the megakaryocyte participate in platelet production. 4. In addition to the megakaryocyte, the cells that have been observed to take part in platelet formation are hyperplastic endothelial cells in the marrow, and mononuclear and transitional cells (premegakaryocytes) in the marrow, spleen, and blood.
When connective tissue cells have been cultivated for a certain length of time in a medium which has been repeatedly changed, a definite relation arises between the rate of growth of the cells and the composition of the medium. It is possible, by adding to the culture medium a given quantity of certain substances, such as embryonic juices, to foresee the extent to which a fragment of tissue composed of a given strain of cells will increase in a given time. The rate of growth of a strain of cells can be accelerated or retarded by the addition to the medium of activating or retarding substances. The dynamic condition of a strain of connective tissue cells, which have been living in a given medium for some time, is not a definitely acquired characteristic, but a temporary state, and is the product or function of the medium in which the cells are living, and is readily modified merely by altering the composition of the medium. A knowledge of the characteristics of the growth of connective tissue described has led to a new result,-the indefinite proliferation of a strain of connective tissue cells outside of the organism. The strain of connective tissue originally obtained from a fragment of chick embryo heart, which had been pulsating in vitro for 104 days, was still actively alive after sixteen months of independent life and more than 190 passages. The rate of proliferation of the connective tissue sixteen months old equalled and even exceeded that of fresh connective tissue taken from an eight day old embryo. It appears, therefore, that time has no effect on the tissues isolated from the organism and preserved by means of the technique described above. During the sixteenth month of life in vitro the cells increased rapidly in number and were able in a short time to produce a large quantity of new tissue. This fact, therefore, definitely demonstrates that the tissues were not in a state of survival, as was the case in certain earlier experiments, but in a condition of real life, since the cells of which they were composed, like microorganisms, multiplied indefinitely in the culture medium.
In order to establish the influence of temperature upon the effect of varying doses of strychnin injected into frogs, the animals must be kept under observation for several days and at various definite degrees of temperature. Statements that the animal was kept "cold," "at room temperature," or "warm" are insufficient. With a certain dose tetanus may result constantly at 30 degrees C. yet never appear at 21 degrees C., and either of these temperatures might be described as warm, when compared to a room temperature of 15 degrees C. Furthermore an animal may apparently fail to respond in the cold to an injection of certain doses of strychnin and yet be found in tetanic convulsions the next day. That an animal may have late, long lasting, or strong tetanus while kept at such a low temperature as 5 degrees C. after an injection of a dose of strychnin smaller than 0.01 of a milligram per frog emphasizes the fact that great caution must be exercised in formulating laws as to the influence of temperature on drug action. The main results of this investigation may be summarized as follows: Doses of strychnin amounting to 0.0006 of a milligram per gram of frog will cause tetanus at all temperatures between 5 degrees C. and 30 degrees C., although at low temperatures the tetanus may appear late. A dose of 0.0003 of a milligram per gram of frog will frequently produce tetanus at 5 degrees C. as well as at 30 degrees or 27 degrees C., but may nevertheless fail to produce any reaction at such an intermediary temperature as 21 degrees C. Smaller doses, 0.0002 of a milligram per gram, will cause tetanus in the cold but not at high temperatures. It may be stated in general that in frogs kept at low temperatures the tetanic state sets in later, continues longer, and each tetanic attack is of longer duration, while in the interval between the attacks the state of tonus is higher and the animals are more irritable than when they are kept at higher temperatures.
Under the experimental conditions outlined, sodium tartrate subcutaneously introduced into rabbits fails to reappear in the urine. It is concluded that the disintegrative influence of the salt upon the convoluted tubules is sufficient to account for the failure of the salt to be eliminated. No evidence of a vicarious function on the part of the glomerulus was observed.
Salts of tartaric acid administered subcutaneously to fasting phlorhizinized animals exert a markedly detrimental influence upon the secretory efficiency of the kidney, which is indicated by a greatly lessened output of certain typical urinary constituents. A histological study of the nephritic kidney demonstrates that the salts act specifically upon the epithelium of the convoluted tubules, and to a less extent upon the tubules of the loops of Henle, the glomerules, and interstitial tissue remaining unharmed. In the disintegrative process taking place, vacuolation first occurs, is rapidly followed by necrosis, and finally the dead cells or their debris may entirely fill the lumina of the tubules and form granular and hyaline casts. There is no strict relation between the dose of tartrate and the extent of damage inflicted. While large doses invariably induce a well marked response small doses may at times produce effects equally significant. Tartrates introduced into fasting animals call forth symptoms practically identical with those observed in fasting phlorhinized animals. It is therefore apparent that in the establishment of the pathological condition under discussion phlorhizin is without significant influence. Neither the liver nor the adrenal exhibits any detrimental effect from the injection of tartrates. The introduction of tartrates by way of the mouth to fasting rabbits is not nearly so effective in the production of nephritic symptoms as the administration of much smaller doses subcutaneously. In general, under the former circumstances the initial stages only of epithelial disintegration of the convoluted tubules obtain, which, however, are scarcely sufficient to account for the rapidity with which death usually ensues. Although in well fed animals distinct pathological changes in the kidney are induced by the introduction of tartrates per os, these abnormalities are less in degree, but similar in kind, than those provoked under like conditions in the fasting animal. When tartrates are given subcutaneously to well fed rabbits the effects evoked are somewhat less pronounced than when the salts are injected into fasting animals. From these facts it is evident that the state of nutrition plays a part in the development of tartrate nephritis. It is indicated that the introduction of a sufficiency of alkali to animals in a state of fasting permits a greater elimination of urinary constituents during tartrate nephritis than obtains under similar circumstances when the alkali is omitted. Histologically there is evidence that the administration of alkali exerts a slight modifying action.
After the intravenous introduction of a solution containing sodium chloride and urea into the rabbit during pronounced tartrate nephritis, all the chloride reappears in the urine within forty-eight hours. On the other hand, the nitrogen of the urine remains far below that usually eliminated by the normal animal under the experimental conditions; in other words, little or none of the urea injected is excreted by the kidney. In the light of the histological findings these results are interpreted to mean that under normal conditions chlorides and water are passed through the glomerular mechanism, whereas urea becomes a urinary constituent by way of the convoluted tubules. These results constitute a direct confirmation of the older observations of others concerning the elimination by the kidney of the substances under discussion. No evidence was obtained that the glomerulus may take over the function of the tubular epithelium.
1. The blood flow in the feet is smaller per unit of volume of the part than in the hand, the ratio of foot flow to hand flow per 100 cubic centimeters of the part usually lying in normal persons between 1 to 3 and 1 to 2. 2. In the supine position, with the legs hanging down, the flow in the feet seems to be somewhat greater than in the sitting position.
1. In the cases of fever investigated the flow in the feet never exceeded the normal flow and was usually much below the normal 2. In explanation of the relatively small foot flow in the fever cases it is suggested that the vasoconstrictor mechanism of the peripheral parts, especially of the skin, is abnormally excited, and some direct evidence that this is the case is brought forward. 3. The significance of this hypersensitiveness, or at least increased action, of the cutaneous vasoconstrictor mechanism is assumed to be that the peripheral vasoconstriction is a compensatory arrangement which secures for the organs mainly suffering from the infective process an increased flow of blood. 4. On this hypothesis the rise of temperature is, chiefly at least, secondary, inevitably following the vasoconstriction, provided that the metabolism is, upon the whole, not diminished. 5. Accordingly the rational treatment of hyperpyrexia, or of pyrexia if it is considered necessary to treat it, is to abstract heat by a process which will not diminish and may even increase the cutaneous vasoconstriction. This condition is exactly fulfilled by the cold bath, at least as regards its initial effect. Other so called tonic effects of the cold bath are not considered here. Antipyretic drugs which act by dilating the cutaneous vessels would seem to be inferior in this regard. They diminish the temperature, it is true, but at the cost of defeating the beneficial redistribution of the blood which it is the function of the peripheral vasoconstriction to insure. 6. It is obvious that for the elimination of a given quantity of heat from the skin by radiation and conduction in fever, a smaller cutaneous blood flow will suffice than with normal body temperature, since the elimination of heat per gram of blood passing through the surface must be greater in fever owing to the greater difference of temperature between the surface of the body and its surroundings. I am much indebted to the staff of the City Hospital for their coöperation which has rendered this investigation possible.
1. Embryonic chick and rat tissues preserved at temperatures ranging from -7 degrees to +20 degrees C. live longest at about +6 degrees C. The duration of life under the most favorable conditions is less than twenty days. 2. The kind of isotonic medium used,-plasma serum, Ringer solution, or normal salt solution,-does not appreciably influence the period of survival. The quantity of medium in proportion to tissue is similarly without marked effect.
It has been shown for the first time that nerve fibers grow out from pieces of cerebellum of young cats and guinea pigs, when cultivated in coagulated plasma. The same phenomenon has been observed in cultures of spinal ganglia. The nerve fibers do not anastomose and they extend into the plasma unaccompanied by structures of any kind.
Ultraviolet light rapidly kills the cells of a transplantable sarcoma of the fowl without notably injuring the etiological agent associated therewith. The Roentgen ray has little effect on either cells or agent. Fowls manifest two sorts of resistance to the avian tumor, one directed against the implanted tumor cells as such, the other against the action of the etiological agent to cause a neoplastic change. In the individual fowl the two resistances appear to be independent of one another, though they may exist together or may both be absent. A recognition of them will perhaps explain some features in the biology of other tumors.
1. The serum of rabbits treated intravenously with neosalvarsan, and of syphilitic patients treated intravenously with salvarsan or neosalvarsan, has a definite spirochaeticidal action upon Spirochoeta duttoni. 2. Although this spirochaeticidal action is exerted in vitro, it can be demonstrated only after the treated spirochaetae are injected into susceptible animals. 3. A curative action of the serum of neosalvarsan-treated rabbits is exercised on mice infected with Spirochoeta duttoni. 4. The spirochaeticidal action of the serum of salvarsan-treated rabbits and patients is markedly increased by heating at 56 degrees C. for thirty minutes. 5. The increased spirochaeticidal action produced by heating is due in part to the destruction of some inhibitory substance contained in normal serum and in part to a direct effect of the heat upon the serum and salvarsan mixture. 6. Cerebrospinal fluid does not contain the inhibitory substance present in normal unheated serum.
Electrocardiographic examination of rabbits during the anaphylactic reaction revealed marked and various changes of the heart's activity in twenty-two out of twenty-four animals. Changes occurred in fatal as well as in non-fatal cases, after the vagi were cut as well as when they were intact. Cardiac disturbances are thus a practically constant result of serum anaphylaxis in the rabbit. It therefore is possible that anaphylaxis plays a role in the causation of certain cardiac derangements in man.
After splenectomy anemia usually develops quickly and reaches its height in from three to six weeks; then with gradual improvement the blood picture approaches the normal after about three to four months, with complete return to normal in five to ten months. Accompanying this is marked leucocytosis reaching its height in twenty-four hours but persisting to a slight degree for several months. Variations, however, may occur, in that the anemia may develop slowly and be of slight degree, or the reparative process may be delayed and up to ten months incomplete. The anemia is, however, inevitable, as is also, later, some degree of repair.
The increased resistance of the red blood corpuscles characteristic of the splenectomized animal is as evident one year after removal of the spleen as it is at earlier periods. So also is the decreased tendency to jaundice after the administration of hemolytic serum. The increase in resistance of the red cells cannot be explained on the basis of an increase in reticulated cells in the circulating blood.
The most striking point brought out in this study is that as long as a definite pressure is maintained in either the pulmonary or bronchial circulations, the admixture of bloods is extremely limited. It is easily conceivable that more mixture occurs normally than under the conditions of the experiment, but there is no reason for considering this to be a large difference. If, however, in either system the pressure sinks to zero the possibility of supply by the other system becomes evident. It takes much longer for the mass injected through the bronchial arteries to penetrate to all parts of the lung than when the mass is injected through the pulmonary artery; but when accomplished, the injection reaches to all capillaries including those of the pleura, the only vessels remaining uninjected being the larger trunks of the pulmonary artery. On the other hand, the injection of the bronchial vessels by way of the pulmonary arteries is not complete with normal pressure, but occurs rapidly when a high pulmonary pressure is employed. It is therefore probable that either circulation can suffice for the simple nutritive demands of the lung if the other system is interfered with. It has been shown that embolism of the pulmonary artery, without other circulatory disturbance, does not lead to necrosis of the affected area of the lung, but it is probable that the preservation of circulation is not due to collateral bronchial circulation so much as to the free anastomosis and early division into capillaries of the pulmonary artery. In support of this statement is the fact that the appearance is not altered when the bronchials are ligated at their origin. The same ligation shows no subsequent interference with the nutrition of the bronchi up to a period of five weeks, demonstrating that the pulmonary circulation is sufficient to provide for the nutrition of the bronchi. If, however, as Virchow has shown, the pulmonary artery supplying an entire lobe be occluded, the bronchial circulation can and does suffice for the nutrition of the lobe. In the case of the occlusion of a branch of the pulmonary artery the pressure in the area interfered with does not sink to zero because of the collateral circulation in this area; whereas, if the main trunk is occluded no collateral supply is available, the pressure sinks to zero, and the bronchial artery becomes available as a source of blood supply. It must be remembered that the lung tissue, as a whole, has ready access to oxygen and this gas is the nutritive element acquired by the blood in the lungs. From these studies it would appear that the part of the lung tissue not in intimate contact with oxygen in the air is supplied by oxygenated blood of the bronchial arteries, and that the tissues through which the pulmonary blood circulates take up whatever organized nutriment they need from the pulmonary blood and possibly provide for their oxygen and carbon dioxide interchange (which must be very slight) either directly with the alveolar air, or by finding sufficient oxygen in the venous blood of the pulmonary artery. The studies of the injected specimens confirm Küttner's findings of a very rapid breaking up of the pulmonary artery into capillaries. In all the specimens studied it was found that although the pleural vessels can be injected by way of the bronchial arteries when there is zero pressure in the pulmonary arteries, yet when the two sets of vessels are injected simultaneously in the dog, the pleural vessels invariably derive their supply of injection mass from the pulmonary artery.
From series 1 it is concluded that increases in pulmonary pressure improve the circulation in the embolic areas and that decreases in pulmonary pressure limit the circulation in the same areas. In this series the bronchial vessels showed no tendency to take up the circulation in the area of pulmonary embolism until the pulmonary pressure was as low as zero, and then only to a limited degree. It has been shown, however, that in the circulation of an entire lobe the fall to zero pressure in the pulmonary circuit is followed by almost complete taking over of the circulation by the bronchial arterial supply and the most reasonable explanation of why this does not occur when embolism is present in a smaller branch of the pulmonary is the inference that the physiological anastomosis between the two systems takes place in part before the pulmonary artery breaks up into branches small enough to be occluded by seeds of about three millimeters in diameter. From series 2 it is concluded that although increases in pressure in the bronchial arteries cause somewhat greater inflow of bronchial injection mass into the embolic area, extremely high pressures are not sufficient to provide for complete circulation in the same district. This fact would tend to support further the belief that the anastomosis between the two vascular systems occurs before the smaller divisions of the pulmonary artery are reached. From series 3 it is concluded that with a zero pressure in the pulmonary artery there is improved injection of the embolic area through the bronchial artery which is to be expected when it is remembered that zero pressure in the pulmonary artery favors a taking over of the circulation by the bronchial system. What pressure is found in the smaller pulmonary vessels is supplied by the bronchials. It has been shown that the anastomosis between the two systems probably occurs before the branches are reached which would provide lodgment for the turnip radish seeds. The pressure supplied by the bronchials would naturally be less beyond this point and hence the injection would be less complete in the embolic area than in the normal lung. This is shown to be the case by the results of the experiment. From series 4 it is concluded that the absence of pressure in the bronchial circulation favors a better injection of the embolic area through the pulmonary vessels, which is to be expected when it is recalled that not until zero pressure is reached in the bronchial circuit does the pulmonary artery supply the bronchial vessels with blood. Throughout the study it was found that whenever the two vascular systems were injected simultaneously the pleural vessels over the embolic area, as well as those over the normal lung, received their supply from the pulmonary vessels. When only one system was used for injection the pleural vessels over the embolic area showed about the same degree of injection as those of the embolic area itself.
The purines of tumors are generally the same as those of the normal tissue, chiefly guanine and adenine, little more than traces of xanthine, and relatively small amounts of hypoxanthine being found. No uric acid was found in the tumors of this series. In one tumor, an embryonal adenosarcoma in a pig's kidney, a large amount of hypoxanthine, and no adenine was found, while the yield of xanthine was also unusually high. This result cannot be explained at present on experimental grounds, but evidently a nucleic acid complex containing no adenine was encountered. Possibly hypoxanthine was present in inosinic acid. The purine enzymes are generally the same in tumors as in the normal tissue from which the tumors are derived. This fact sometimes makes it possible to learn by chemical study from what tissue a given kind of tumor is derived, when the microscopic evidence is inconclusive. Although the liver of the sheep contains the enzyme xanthine oxidase, it may be absent from primary tumors in the sheep liver, as it has also been shown to be from secondary tumors in the human liver. As xanthine oxidase is one of the last of the purine enzymes to develop in the embryonal organism, its absence in a malignant tumor containing otherwise the same purine enzymes as the tissue from which it is derived, is evidence of the embryonal character of the tumor tissue.
1. The smallest amount of the sodium soaps necessary for the complete hemolysis of 0.5 of a cubic centimeter of a 5 per cent. suspension of the red blood corpuscles of the sheep, ox, rabbit, dog, or of man, is about the same,-0.03 of a milligram in the case of the following acids: oleic, linoleic, dibromostearic, chloriodostearic, and two isomeric monobromostearic acids; in the case of erucic acid about twice as much of the soap was found to be necessary; in that of palmitic or of dihydroxystearic acid more than ten times as much. 2. The minimum hemolytic quantity of the sodium soaps of the highly unsaturated acids obtained from cod liver oil and from linseed oil is only very slightly less than that of sodium oleate. 3. It follows, therefore, from these results that hemolysis by unsaturated fatty acids is not more active in proportion to the degree to which these acids are unsaturated, nor is it diminished when the unsaturated carbon atoms are saturated by halogens. It is, on the other hand, greatly diminished when they are converted into the corresponding hydroxyl acids, which are hemolytic only to the same degree as the saturated acids. 4. The idea that toxic hemolysis, in disease, in poisoning by phosphorus or toluylene diamine, results from the liberation of specially hemolytic fatty acids from the fatty complexes of disintegrating cells is not well supported by evidence; none of the fatty acids, still less any of the fatty complexes from which these acids can be obtained in any of the organs examined, either in this work or in the work of others that has preceded it, show on analysis any evidence for the existence of fatty acids more toxic than the common oleic acid which is constantly being set free by hydrolysis from common fat in health.
THE ESSENTIAL POINTS OF OUR RESULTS ARE AS FOLLOWS: The saprophytic Bacillus megatherium produced a definite pulmonary lesion which in gross appearance resembled the lesion of lobar pneumonia. The lesion was one of intense leucocytic exudation which, as in some other cases of experimental lobar pneumonia, did not invade the framework of the lung. But the exudate contained no fibrin. There were practically no bacilli, either in the heart's blood or in the lung. The growth of two colonies from one of the cases hardly changes the rule. The lesion did not progress after twenty-four hours; nor did it show a definite increase in extent or intensity with the increase in quantity of the injected cultures. The resolution of the exudate began practically at the end of twenty-four hours and was far advanced on the third day. Although there was considerable leucocytic infiltration there was no phagocytosis apparent twenty-four hours after inoculation. Taking all the facts into consideration one gains the impression that the lesion produced by the saprophytic Bacillus megatherium differs only quantitatively from that produced by an avirulent pneumococcus. The fact stands out prominently that a saprophytic bacterium is capable of producing a pneumonic lesion similar in gross appearance to that of mild lobar pneumonia. It is not improbable that other saprophytes may be capable of producing pneumonic lesions which, in specific instances, may resemble lobular pneumonia.
Comparing the pneumonic lesions produced by this very virulent streptococcus with those caused by a mildly virulent strain of the same organism, we find that with one exception the differences between them are only of a quantitative nature and not striking. There are the same intense leucocytic exudation into the alveoli and the leucocytic infiltration of the framework of the lungs. Macroscopically the pneumonia produced by the virulent organism was, as a rule, lobular in character. Occasionally, however, especially when large doses of the culture had been given, the gross appearance of the lesion gave the impression of a lobar pneumonia. But even in these cases the cut surface showed that the solid areas were separated by softer and lighter areas of aerated, congested, or edematous lung substance. Pleurisy was practically absent from the lungs in this series of experiments; only one case showed a narrow strip of fibrinous exudate on the pleura. Although in some instances large doses of the cultures were given and some dogs were permitted to live six or seven days, there was no mortality among the dogs in these experiments, just as there had been none among the animals experimented upon with the streptococcus of very low virulence. The course of the pneumonia caused by the virulent organism seemed to be somewhat longer than that produced by the less virulent one; areas of resolving pneumonia were found to persist on the sixth and seventh days after the injection, and in one such instance the solid focus contained viable organisms. There was some difference in the amount of fibrin present in the exudate caused by the two strains of streptococci. Although even in these experiments the amount of fibrin present was less than that found in the lesion produced by the virulent pneumococcus, it was perceptibly larger than the very small amount found in the lesions caused by the less virulent strain of streptococcus. It should be mentioned that there was no difference in the degree of phagocytosis observed in these two series of experiments. It was not marked in either case. One point of difference in the two series was noted: during the first forty-eight hours after insufflation of the virulent strain of streptococcus the blood of the animals obtained from the jugular vein during life and from the heart after death contained living organisms, while in the experiments with the slightly virulent streptococcus no living cocci were recovered from the blood. The virulence of the strain of streptococcus employed in the present investigation was, as has been pointed out, similar to that of the pneumococcus employed in the investigation of Lamar and Meltzer and in many of our own experiments, as far as mice were concerned, since both killed mice weighing fifteen grams in doses of 0.000,001 of a cubic centimeter in twenty-four to thirty-six hours. The findings in the lesions caused by these two organisms are comparable and therefore some deductions may be drawn regarding the similarity or dissimilarity of their actions. One of the first things we wish to bring out is the correction of our former statement regarding the presence of the cocci in the blood. As our new investigation shows, there is evidently no difference in this respect between the streptococcus and the pneumococcus. When both organisms are highly virulent they can be found in the circulating blood of the living dog or in the heart's blood of the dead dog during the first twenty-four or forty-eight hours after an intrabronchial insufflation. On the other hand, the present investigation rather confirms in a general way our first contention that the pneumonic lesions produced by the two different organisms differ distinctly in many ways. There is the difference in the mortality; even with fairly large quantities of the culture of the virulent streptococcus the mortality was nil in this series, although some of the dogs were kept alive for six and seven days. The mortality of the pneumococcus infection depends upon the quantity insufflated and may amount, as Lamar and Meltzer pointed out, to 16 per cent. The gross appearance of the lesion produced by the pneumococcus is, as frequently stated, that of a lobar pneumonia, frequently accompanied by a fibrinous exudate on the pleura. The gross appearance of the lesion produced even by a virulent streptococcus is, as a rule, that of a lobular pneumonia and is practically never accompanied by pleurisy. In the few instances in which large quantities of the streptococcus were given and the outward appearance of the lungs approached that of a lobar pneumonia, it was found that on section of the consolidated lung the solid foci proved to be separated by lighter areas of aerated, congested lung. In the lesions produced by the virulent streptococci the walls of the finer bronchi and the framework of the lung were markedly infiltrated with leucocytes, while in the lobar pneumonia produced by the pneumococcus the framework remained free from such infiltration. Finally there is the unmistakable difference in the amount of fibrin present in the alveolar exudate. While in the exudate of the lesion produced by the virulent streptococcus the amount was perceptibly larger than the insignificant amount present in the lesion caused by a slightly virulent strain, it is not to be compared with the large amount of fibrin which exists in the exudate of pneumococcus pneumonia. The several investigations which we have carried out seem to show conclusively that in general the streptococcus causes a lobular pneumonia which, besides the leucocytic intra-alveolar exudation, is characterized by a leucocytic infiltration of the lung framework, and that the pneumococcus causes a lobar pneumonia, which is practically free from leucocytic infiltration of the interstitial tissue of the lung. Furthermore, a virulent pneumococcus causes a lesion in which fibrin is a prominent element in the exudate and that element distinguishes the exudate sharply from the exudate of the lesion caused by a virulent streptococcus in which fibrin is present only in moderate amount. It distinguishes it in a still more striking manner from the exudates of the lesions caused by non-virulent pneumococci or streptococci, in which fibrin is present only in very small amounts. It seems that the formation of fibrin is connected in some specific way with the pneumococcus on the one hand, and with the virulence of the organism on the other. For even with the relatively small amounts of fibrin present in the exudates of lesions caused by the streptococcus there is a perceptible difference in the quantity according to the virulence of the organism. Whether fibrin is a means which enhances virulence, or whether it is a reaction product against it, our experiments so far do not entitle us to discuss.
Anaphylactic shock in the dog, caused by the intravenous injection of horse serum into sensitized animals, may produce definite cardiac disturbances which are revealed by the electrocardiogram. These cardiac changes consist of disturbances in conduction of the heart impulses, abnormalities in the ventricular contractions, and other unusual disturbances of the mechanism of the heart-beat. They come on very quickly after the injection of serum and may be of short duration, and are not obtained during anti-anaphylaxis. They are not the result of the marked fall in blood pressure which occurs, nor does the central cardiac inhibitory mechanism play a part in their production. These cardiac disturbances apparently are a definite primary expression of anaphylactic shock in the dog. The right ventricle seems to be more affected than the left.
1. An organism was isolated and studied in pure cultures from cases of conjunctivitis accompanied by the so called trachoma body inclusions, as well as from a case of old trachoma without inclusions. 2. This organism was not found in the cultures made from other forms of conjunctivitis in which the inclusions were absent. 3. The organism presents the morphological features characteristic of so called trachoma bodies. It undergoes an early transformation, during which the forms known as initial bodies appear, and a later change, during which forms resembling elementary granules arise, while certain intermediate forms between these occur simultaneously. 4. No definite cell inclusions could be produced in monkeys by inoculating pure cultures of the organism. 5. The cultivation of this organism from a case of trachoma without the cell inclusions, together with the previously ascertained fact that the inclusions can be produced in suitable animals by inoculating such material directly from a human case, suggests the possibility of the organism being still present in such cases of trachoma, although not in the form of cell inclusions. 6. The facts presented justify the statement that by a suitable method an organism resembling the various important stages of the trachoma bodies and totally distinct from the gonococcus has been obtained in a living condition, capable of indefinite cultivation from cases of human trachoma and inclusion conjunctivitis. Whether the organism and trachoma bodies are identical cannot be positively stated at present. But the way is now opened to determine this point, as well as the specificity of the trachoma bodies.
1. Pneumococci, when freshly isolated from the body, are able to live and multiply when a small number of them are inoculated into a small amount of broth. If, however, the inoculations are made in large amounts of broth, many more bacteria must be inoculated in order that they may grow. 2. It requires much smaller numbers of pneumococci to start a growth on agar than are required to start a growth in broth. 3. This predilection for solid medium disappears when the bacteria are grown for some time outside the body. 4. This phenomenon is not dependent on differences in chemical composition between the two media employed or on the presence of more available oxygen in one case than in the other. 5. It is probably dependent entirely on physical differences in the two kinds of media, and bears some relation to the differences in possibilities for diffusion in the two media.
Bürgers, Schermann, and Schreiber (1) studied "Auflösungserscheinungen von Bakterien," and concluded that ferments were probably not the main factor in such lysis. Kantorowicz (2) in studying antiferment and bacteriolysis came to the opinion that there was an antiferment in the bodies of bacteria which prevented digestion. This antiferment was likewise an antibody to serum bacteriolysins. But Kantorowicz used as a standard of ferment action merely the clearing up of the bacterial suspension. Our report shows that lysis of pneumococci may be independent of ferment action, and that it is not correct to assume that clearing up of a bacterial suspension even in the presence of a proteolytic ferment indicates proteolysis.
1. Tubercle bacilli injected into the peritoneal cavities of tuberculous guinea pigs, rats, rabbits, dogs, and monkeys, rapidly disappear from the peritoneal fluids, while persisting in the peritoneal fluids of normal control animals. 2. This disappearance is in part due to an adhesion of the injected bacilli to the peritoneal leucocytes and a fixation of the leucocytes on the omentum. 3. The injected tubercle bacilli can be recovered quantitatively from the peritoneal cavities of normal guinea pigs from one and one half to two hours after the injection, while from tuberculous guinea pigs only 65 per cent. of the bacilli can be recovered at this time. 4. Isolated peritoneal tissues from tuberculous guinea pigs have the power of destroying tubercle bacilli in vitro. 5. A second factor reducing the number of tubercle bacilli free in the peritoneal fluid is therefore an actual lysis of the bacilli. 6. The intraperitoneal lysis is not due solely to substances present in the circulating fluids, since the phenomenon cannot be produced by these fluids in vitro, and since a lytic power cannot be passively conferred even by a direct transfusion of blood from tuberculous to normal animals. 7. The intraperitoneal lysis is apparently due to specific changes in the fixed peritoneal cells of the tuberculous animals.
It has been our aim to determine in what particular the blood is altered during tetany so that it can produce hyperexcitability of the motor nerves. As a working hypothesis it has been assumed that (1) there may be a lack of calcium in the blood and tissues; (2) there may be a circulating poison which like an oxalate could render inactive the circulating calcium; and (3) there may be a substance in circulation vaguely resembling strychnia in its action upon the nervous system and directly causing the hyperexcitability. It is impossible to decide with our present knowledge which, if any, of these explanations is the true one, but certain experimental results are brought forward. If tetany blood be used to perfuse a normal leg the excitability of the nerves rises to a characteristically high level and the addition of parathyroid extract to the blood has little or no effect in lowering this excitability. Parathyroid extract whether from the ox or the dog fails when injected into the circulation of an animal in tetany to reduce the excitability of the nerves markedly or permanently, although it seems to affect the more sensitive ganglion cells thus cutting off excessive impulses to the periphery. Although the nerves remain hyperexcitable, tetany is usually much diminished or abolished entirely. This seems to be analogous to the action of ether or any other anesthetic which may inhibit the activities of the ganglion cells, although it leaves the nerves excitable and able to conduct impulses. An animal in tetany relaxes instantly on being given ether although the excitability of the nerves to electric currents is little changed. Bleeding followed by the replacement of the blood with an indifferent solution free from calcium stops tetany and lowers the excitability of the nerves. Probably this cannot be ascribed to the removal of a circulating poison, but rather to a general disturbance of the nutrition of the nervous system. Oxalate-like substances introduced into the circulation rapidly, and for a short time only, may kill the animal, but they seem to produce no change in the excitability of the nerves. If the solution is injected very slowly and over a long period the protective action of the body seems to be overcome and the excitability of the nerves rises to high levels. This seems to resemble somewhat the latent period after the destruction of the parathyroid before tetany begins. Direct analysis of the blood shows that as compared with the normal, the blood of an animal in tetany is very poor in calcium. Administration of parathyroid extract does not increase this calcium content. On the contrary, if the extirpation of the parathyroids has been incomplete so that tetany does not appear, the calcium content of the blood is that of the normal animal. Even yet, therefore, in spite of our efforts to shake it, the theory that tetany is closely dependent upon a disturbance of the calcium content of the blood is supported by stronger evidence than any other idea, but much remains to be done before a clear conception of the process is reached.
A spontaneous chicken sarcoma, peculiarly fissured by blood sinuses, and with a tendency to intracanalicular extension into them, has been transplanted and studied in eight successive groups of fowls. Histologically the growth is a characteristic neoplasm, while in its transfer to new hosts a real transplantation is obviously involved. The development of the first few series of transplantation tumors was very slow. They exhibited the histological structure of the original growth and had the same tendency to metastasize to the skeletal muscles. Recently the tumor has grown more rapidly and in a higher percentage of hosts. With this has come a simplification of structure to that of a pure, spindle-celled sarcoma. Fowls of an alien variety (Plymouth Rock) form quite as good hosts for the tumor as those of the sort (brown Leghorn) in which it was originally found. It has not grown in pigeons, rats, or mice. The question of the cause of the tumor is not taken up in the present paper. It has been found to be due to an agent which will pass through Berkefeld filters. The growth is quite distinct in its characters from the other two transplantable neoplasms of the fowl (a spindle-celled sarcoma, an osteochondrosarcoma) which have such a cause. No growth like it has been observed among the forty-three spontaneous tumors of the fowl that have come under our observation.
In the splenectornized dog the anemia caused by hemolytic poisons (hemolytic immune serum and sodium oleate) and by bleeding is of a severer grade, runs a longer course, and is accompanied by a less rapid regeneration of the blood than is the case in the normal dog. Also in the splenectomized dog, especially after the use of hemolytic serum, the leucocytosis is greater than in the normal animal. The splenectomized dog almost uniformly exhibits an increased resistance of the red cells to hypotonic salt solution, but after the administration of hemolytic poisons, and especially hemolytic serum, this increased resistance disappears and a decreased resistance persists for long periods of time. The same change occurs in the normal dog, but in the latter the return to the previous degree of resistance is more rapid than in the splenectomized animal.
The repeated injection of small doses of horse serum and egg-white in dogs, cats, rabbits, and guinea pigs that have been sensitized to these proteins, causes injury to the cells of various organs and tissues with resulting inflammatory reactions. The changes are especially marked after intraperitoneal injections in the peritoneum and after intravenous injections in the livers of rabbits and cats, and in the myocardium and kidneys of all groups of animals. In dogs and rabbits, especially, there develops a well marked nephritis characterized by degeneration and necrosis of the epithelium of the loops of Henle, of the collecting tubules, and less frequently of the convoluted tubules. This is accompanied by an extensive small round cell infiltration of the interstitial tissue and later the formation of connective tissue. Together with these changes there are acute and chronic alterations in the glomeruli of all groups of animals. Egg-white in large doses is itself injurious to the kidney of animals, but this slight primary toxicity is probably greatly enhanced through previous sensitization of the animal.
The tumultuous auricular activity which follows faradization of the auricles of mammals and which has been variously described, could be distinctly seen to consist almost constantly in our experiments on dogs of true fibrillatory movements of the separate muscle fibers coëxisting with a rapid auricular tachycardia. During peripheral stimulation of the right vagus nerve the true fibrillation alone existed, the tachycardia being inhibited. A comparison of the electrocardiograms from dogs with this abnormal auricular activity with those from patients with the type of cardiac arhythmia which has been attributed to auricular fibrillation, and from patients with so called auricular flutter, indicates that the auricular activity in patients with either of these conditions differs somewhat from that usually seen in the faradized auricles of the dog in our experiments. The auricular activity of the cases of cardiac arhythmia is apparently true fibrillation, similar to that seen in the faradized auricles of the dog during right vagus stimulation. The electrocardiograms from cases of so called auricular flutter usually give no evidence of auricular fibrillation, and the auricular activity seems to consist of tachycardia alone. Fibrillation may apparently coëxist with the tachycardia in some cases, when the auricular activity seems to resemble closely that usually seen in the dog after auricular faradization. During peripheral stimulation of the left vagus nerve, the electrocardiograms obtained after auricular faradization show changes which render them more nearly similar to those obtained from patients with auricular flutter. The facts that the auricular activity of the faradized auricles of the dog may apparently pass spontaneously into that closely resembling auricular flutter in man, that it may be changed into true fibrillation by right vagus stimulation, and that the abnormal auricular activity in man passes from a state of flutter to that of fibrillation in a similar manner, may be taken as evidence for the belief that auricular fibrillation and auricular flutter in man are closely allied cardiac disorders.
